GUANGZHOU, China — After a sharp economic slowdown through much of last year, China's economy is growing again — but not at its previous double-digit pace, and with signs that inflation might become a problem again.Shops were crowded this past weekend, construction sites show renewed activity and factories are hiring as exports and domestic demand recover — trends all underlined by government data released over the last several days.Further data to be released Friday and Saturday — including monthly, quarterly and annual figures for industrial production, fixed-asset investment, retail sales and overall economic output — are also expected to show that the Chinese economy, the world's second largest after that of the United States, is expanding once again.Many shopkeepers are noticing a rebound in retail sales. Among them was Liu Licai, a merchant in southern China who sells curtains and other household goods. Although some industries, like auto manufacturing, still suffer from bloated inventories, retailers like Ms. Liu are finding their shelves too empty and are starting to place more orders with suppliers, keeping factories busy."Business has gone up by more than 10 percent in the last several months," Ms. Liu said during a brief lull on an otherwise busy day.Yet the pace of China's expansion may not be fast enough to do much for the rest of the world. China's imports are growing less than half as fast as its exports, making it hard for China to become the locomotive to pull the global economy out of its half-decade funk. And overall growth is not rebounding to previous levels.Until last year, the Chinese government set 8 percent annual growth as a goal, and the economy frequently delivered several percentage points more than that.Then last March, the government pared the goal to 7.5 percent, and actual growth seems likely to be little higher."The potential growth rate of the economy has come down," Stephen Green, a China economist in the Hong Kong offices of Standard Chartered, said Sunday. "You don't have to be in the double digits to get inflation."Prices rose faster in December, according to government data released Friday. Consumer prices rose 2.5 percent from the level of a year earlier, their fastest pace since May.Economists inside and outside China say the true rate of inflation is as much as double the official rate because of methodological problems in the way China calculates inflation.Mr. Green and other Western economists warned Friday and over the weekend that officially measured inflation at the consumer level could reach 5 percent by the fourth quarter and lead to an increase in interest rates by China's central bank.Producer prices are still declining, but at a slower pace. They were down 1.9 percent in December from a year earlier, the smallest drop since last May.Early in an economic recovery, rising prices tend to be a sign that an economy may not have much unused capacity that can be brought into production quickly. Yet Wen Senrong, the sales manager of the Flying Gift Bag store in Guangzhou, said that she was already seeing costs rise, with increases for rent, materials and labor."Our lease was renewed recently and our rent went up by a double-digit percentage — I feel like I am working for the landlord," she said.Tang Chun, the owner of a factory that makes picture frames in Guangzhou, complained of rising costs for the full range of supplies that she buys, including aluminum, acrylic and glass. But store buyers lack the confidence to accept higher prices, fearing that they will not be able to pass them on to retail customers, she said."Every possible cost is going up, including raw material costs and my rent, but I can't raise prices. It's all coming out of my profit margins," Ms. Tang said.Part of the increase in inflation reflects rising prices for fruits and vegetables, as extremely cold weather in China over the past couple of weeks has damaged winter crops. At the fruit stand where Zeng Xiandan, 25, was stacking tangerines Saturday, prices had just jumped 10 percent to 20 percent for a wide range of produce, including tangerines, which were up 15 percent. Mr. Zeng said the increases had drawn surprisingly little criticism."They understand it's because of the cold weather. Customers have not complained," he said.But economists say the overall rising prices reflect broad shifts in the Chinese economy.China is awash in cash, since the government has expanded the broadly measured money supply over the past five years much more rapidly than the United States, even though the Federal Reserve's moves have attracted considerably more international attention. China's money supply is now larger than that of the United States, even though China's economy is half as large.Strong overall growth in credit is powering a recovery in China's construction sector this winter, as businesses and households are starting to find it easier to borrow.Total credit jumped 28 percent in December from a year ago, led by more corporate bonds and more loans from semi-regulated trusts set up by banks.Until the last several years, China seemed to be expanding its factories so fast and workers were moving into cities so quickly that China could sustain rapid growth just by fully using those factories and workers.But an emerging labor shortage, particularly of young workers, has changed that picture. The country's "one child" policy and more years spent in school have meant fewer young people entering the labor force. The Chinese economy remains dominated by manufacturing, and factory overcapacity still exists in some sectors.At the same time, the labor-intensive service sector is growing rapidly and has far less overcapacity that can be used without causing inflation.As the Chinese eat out more frequently and as its fast-growing population of elderly increasingly enters nursing homes, expansion is taking place in the catering and health care sectors. These sectors, along with education, have had trouble filling numerous but often low-paying positions.Rebounding exports and construction have also increased demand for low-wage workers.Exports leapt 14.1 percent in December from a year earlier, nearly three times as fast as expected, and were led by surging shipments to the United States, data released Thursday showed. Imports rose 6 percent in December, partly because of an 11 percent jump in iron ore imports as steel production rebounded.
HONG KONG — The giant Chinese economy picked up steam during the last few months of 2012, closely watched data from Beijing on Friday confirmed. But at the same time the figures underlined the view that the pace of future growth is likely to remain well below that seen in recent years.China's gross domestic product expanded 7.9 percent during the final quarter of last year, compared to a year earlier — slightly better than expectations, and significantly above the 7.4 percent pace recorded during the previous quarter.Separate data for the month of December also came in a touch better than analysts had forecast: Retail sales expanded 15.2 percent from a year earlier, and industrial output grew 10.3 percent. Both figures were slightly better than those recorded in November.The growth data "was the best we could have wished for," Dariusz Kowalczyk, an economist at Crédit Agricole in Hong Kong, commented in a note. The figures "should put at rest any remaining doubt about China escaping a hard landing," he added, referring to widespread fears last year that China could slow down sharply as the global turmoil, feeble domestic demand and a weak property market weighed on growth.Stock market investors also welcomed the data. The Shanghai composite index rose 1.4 percent, and in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng climbed 1.1 percent.China's mild re-acceleration has been helped by a gradual recovery in overseas demand for Chinese-made goods in recent months, as well as a string of economic stimulus measures announced by the government over the course of last year. These have helped put a floor under the beleaguered property market, and ramped up infrastructure construction activity, in particular.The batch of data released by the Chinese statistics bureau on Friday also underlined that China's once red-hot economy has now settled into a much slower pace of expansion.The head of the statistics authority, Ma Jiantang, acknowledged as much at a press conference in Beijing: "I think you could use these two sentences to give a relatively concise assessment of economic performance in 2012," he said. "First, national economic performance maintained stability while slowing; second, economic and social development made advances while maintaining stability."Annual expansion has slowed to around 8 percent — the pace for 2012 was 7.8 percent, down from the 9.3 percent in 2011 and the 10.4 percent in 2010 — and many economists expect a similar or slightly better pace for 2013.Xianfang Ren, an economist at IHS Global Insight in Beijing, commented that Friday's data confirmed "that the worst is probably over for the economy and that China has avoided a hard landing," But it was "quite a narrow escape." The economy will likely be "wiggling within quite a narrow band of growth rates in 2013, as the upside pull only marginally outweighs the downside drag," Ms. Ren added in an e-mailed note.Many analysts believe that the economy's momentum may ease again later this year if the government alters policies in a bid to prevent inflation and property prices from heating up again.Regulators also are watching out for potential problems caused by lending activities outside the regulated banking system, which have been an important driver of economic activity.The growth of such non-bank credit, commented Yao Wei, an economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong in a recent research report, "is likely to slow once regulators respond seriously to risks rising from the shadow banking system." Along with tighter property policies, Ms. Yao said, this factor is likely to cause the recovering momentum to fade late in the second quarter of this year.Longer term, analysts believe the pace is likely to slow even further over the coming decade as the authorities pursue a shift towards higher-quality growth, and grapple with the gradual aging of the country's population."China's working-age population experienced its first absolute decline for some considerable time, and we are certainly taking this issue seriously," Mr. Ma, the statistics bureau head, said Friday."For quite some time to come, and at least up until 2030, China's working-age population aged from 15 to less than 60 years old will, I think, steadily and gradually shrink," Mr. Ma said. This, he added, meant that it was important for China to raise labor productivity.
BEIJING — Growth in the giant China manufacturing sector in February withdrew from the highest point in nearly two years despite a fourth consecutive month of expansion, a private survey showed Monday, as foreign demand remained unsteady.The HSBC flash purchasing managers' index for February slipped to 50.4, the lowest reading in four months and down from the January reading of 52.3, which had been the best showing since January 2011. Index readings higher than 50 indicate expansion, while those lower than 50 indicate contraction.The flash P.M.I. is the earliest indicator of China's economic health each month and should not alter expectations that China, which has the world's second-largest economy, after that of the United States, is enjoying a gentle recovery, experts said. That would be a welcome development for China's new leaders, who take office in March."The underlying strength of the Chinese growth recovery remains intact, as indicated by still-expanding employment and the recent pickup of credit growth," said Qu Hongbin, an economist at HSBC.In line with recent trends, the flash P.M.I. showed demand for Chinese exports wobbling in February. A subindex measuring new export orders slipped to 49.8.The export sector has been a weak point for the Chinese economy in the past two years, as faltering global economic growth has caused net exports to drag on growth.Although export growth surged to a 21-month high in January in a sign that business was picking up, most economists say that exporters face continued difficulty as demand from Europe and the United States languishes.Still, the survey did not suggest that China's factories were re-entering a slowdown. While most P.M.I. subindexes fell in February, they were pulling back from highs of several months, suggesting that manufacturers were only taking a breather.Some economists may attribute the dip in the February data to the Lunar New Year holiday, which began Feb. 10 this year and fell in January last year, although the survey's publisher, Markit, says the data are seasonally adjusted.The output subindex fell from a 22-month high; new orders backed away from a 20-month high; factory employment edged down from its highest level in 20 months; input prices fell from a 16-month peak; and output prices slid from a 14-month high.As in previous months, the February survey showed that domestic demand had held up better than demand from abroad. The new-order subindex remained comfortably above 50, even after falling from its January level.China holds its annual full-session parliamentary meeting March 5, when the incoming president, Xi Jinping, officially takes the reins of state power, while the departing prime minister, Wen Jiabao, presents the government's 2013 economic goals.Most analysts believe Beijing will retain its 2012 goal for gross domestic product growth of 7.5 percent for this year, giving itself some room to surpass expectations slightly.The Chinese economy grew 7.8 percent in 2012, about in line with expectations, but still the slowest rate in 13 years. Analysts polled by Reuters expect the economy to grow 8.1 percent in 2013.The rebound, though gentle, would comfort investors banking on a modest Chinese economic recovery to lift global growth.Indeed, February was still the fourth consecutive month in which the flash P.M.I. was above 50, despite the retreat. Before the turnaround that began in November, the index had languished at less than 50 for 12 consecutive months.The HSBC P.M.I. survey is based on a poll of purchasing executives from more than 420 manufacturing firms. The flash P.M.I. is compiled from responses from 85 percent to 90 percent of that pool. The final results will be published March 1.
HONG KONG — Manufacturing activity in China has perked up in March after a lull during the Lunar New Year holiday in February, underlining that China's economy appears on track for solid — but not sizzling — growth this year.A closely watched index of sentiment in the vast Chinese manufacturing sector, published by the British bank HSBC on Thursday, showed a reading of 51.7 points in March. That was a better-than-expected improvement from the 50.4 in February, when many factories shut during the Lunar New Year break, and took the reading well above the level of 50 that separates expansion from contraction.But despite the rebound, the March result was shy of the level seen in January — yet another indicator that the economy has settled into more modest growth than it experienced prior to the global financial crisis.The purchasing managers' index reading "implies that the Chinese economy is still on track for gradual growth recovery," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist for HSBC, wrote in a statement accompanying the data release. "Inflation remains well behaved, leaving room for Beijing to keep policy relatively accommodative in a bid to sustain growth recovery."Improving overseas orders for Chinese-made goods and a flow of government-mandated investment into infrastructure projects helped pull the economy out of a slowdown last year, averting a "hard landing."The upturn has, however, been gradual, in part because policy makers have been eager to steer the economy toward more modest expansion in the hope of easing the risks of inflation, potential loan defaults and inefficient investment.Balancing the various pressures will be tricky, analysts warn.A renewed climb in property prices, for example, earlier this month prompted fresh efforts to cool the market — potentially hurting some developers and their lenders.Likewise, the surge in credit that supported growth in recent years has created new risks that will need to be reined in. Zhiwei Zhang, an economist at the investment bank Nomura, warned in a report last Friday that "China is displaying the same three symptoms that Japan, the U.S. and parts of Europe all showed before suffering financial crises: a rapid build-up of leverage, elevated property prices and a decline in potential growth."The government is likely to tighten policy to contain financial risks, Mr. Zhang wrote, but this will come at the cost of slowing overall growth in the second half of this year.Longer term, Chinese demographics — its labor force will shrink as the population ages — mean that the productivity of workers and companies will have to rise. The new leadership in Beijing is betting on faster urbanization as a major driver of future growth.Analysts cautioned, however, that potentially tough changes would also be needed — including, for example, allowing more competition in areas dominated by sprawling state-owned enterprises, and weaning the economy off its reliance on state-driven investment and exports."China's new leaders pledged to make the Chinese dream come true by bringing benefits of growth to the people," economists at Citibank wrote in a research note Monday. "This requires a difficult balance between growth and reform. Reform is likely painful but there is no alternative."
SHANGHAI — For those frustrated with air travel in the United States, arriving at this city's domestic airport can be a treat.New arrivals are whisked on electronic walkways through a bright, spacious airport terminal that features elegant lounges, free Wi-Fi, speedy security checks and an efficient baggage handling system.This is what the best airports now look like in the world's second-largest economy.Three years after it opened, Terminal 2 at Hongqiao International Airport in Shanghai stands as a testament to China's economic ambitions, and to its unique approach to infrastructure development.With extraordinary government support, Shanghai built a massive airport terminal in 32 months as part of a $9 billion transportation hub that connects the air terminal with the city's buses, subway platforms and a new high-speed railway network."They know how to build things and how to do it efficiently," said Jeffrey N. Thomas, chief executive of Landrum & Brown, an American firm that helped design the new Shanghai terminal. "That area went from plans on a piece of paper to a complex that has 14 million square feet in less than four years. That's hard to do."At a time when many American airports are falling into disrepair, China is quickening its air travel development, with plans to build nearly 100 more airports by 2015, including some at high altitudes, where special landing gear is required. Many of those airports are expected to lose money, but that hasn't deterred the government, which views the expansion of infrastructure as vital to economic development.China's big-city airports are already colossal. Last year, Beijing Capital International Airport handled 81 million passengers, up from 27 million in 2002.This year, it could surpass Atlanta's Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport to become the world's busiest.In Shanghai, Pudong Airport — which operates 25 miles east of Hongqiao as the city's international gateway — has so many flights it plans to add a fourth and fifth runway, something few other airports in the world possess.The quality and speed with which China builds its big city airports is impressive. But whether China holds any lessons for airport development in America, or Europe for that matter, is unclear, analysts say.China's building programs are supported by an authoritarian political system that brooks no challenges. When the government decides to build or expand an airport, there are no public hearings or any public protests of note.And while economists ponder the long-term consequences of that decision-making process, this country's leaders push ahead with new megaprojects."There's a pro-investment bias here, partly because the country still has so much surplus labor, which makes it a lot cheaper to build," said Louis Kuijs, an economist at the Royal Bank of Scotland based in Hong Kong. "And this is a country that knows how to build. Look at the Great Wall!"Terminal 2 at Hongqiao Airport is one of those "this could only happen in China" developments. With Terminal 1 congested, the city announced plans in 2006 for a new transportation hub to cover 10 square miles, a project that when complete is likely to be the world's largest transit hub with about 1.1 million passengers a day.To build it, the city cleared 10,000 residents from a huge plot of land west of Hongqiao by building new apartments for them a few miles away. Because the state owns all land in China, and residents have little bargaining power, local governments and developers often benefit from lower development costs.And in the case of the transportation hub, once the land was cleared, state-run banks lined up to lend money to the project."The relocation and acquiring of land this size, only China can do it," said Cao Longjin, general manager of Shanghai Rainbow Investments, a state-run company that helped develop the hub. "It's a miracle."When China went on an earlier airport-building spree in the 1980s and early 1990s, things didn't go quite so smoothly. The airports tended to be poorly designed and minimally functional, and usually lost money.
HONG KONG — The economies of developing Asia appear to have settled into a new growth path that will allow the region to expand by between 6 percent and 7 percent a year — a pace that is significantly slower than that seen before the global financial crisis, yet represents a firm trajectory that could last over the next decade."It looks like we're in a new trend," said Changyong Rhee, the chief economist of the Asian Development Bank, which on Tuesday released its new forecasts for emerging Asia. The region spans developing countries like China, India, Indonesia and Thailand, but not Japan.After relatively muted growth last year, when the region expanded by 6.1 percent, developing Asia is expected to pick up speed again with growth of 6.6 percent this year and 6.7 percent next year, according to the bank's projections."The era of double-digit growth is over," Mr. Rhee said. But, he added in an interview in Hong Kong, the United States is showing signs of recovery, and the euro zone likely to "muddle through" its debt crisis for the foreseeable future. That backdrop leaves developing Asia enjoying a relatively stable growth that was not yet visible just six months ago, when the development bank made its last projections for the region.Faster growth in China — by far the region's largest economy — and what Mr. Rhee called the "remarkable" resilience of southeast Asian economies have been the main drivers of growth there growth, lifting domestic consumption and intraregional trade, and in the process also reducing the region's reliance on the world's advanced, and slower-growing, economies.Growth, however, will be very uneven, with China likely to grow at between 7 percent and 8 percent; the Asean region, comprising countries like Thailand and Malaysia, growing around 5 percent; and more developed economies like Hong Kong, Singapore or Taiwan expanding at little more than 3 percent.Moreover, events in other parts of the world continue to pose major potential risks to Asia.Among them, the development bank said, are the wrangling over the U.S. debt ceiling and the struggles to implement austerity measures in Europe. Border disputes within Asia, potential asset bubbles inflated by the monetary stimulus efforts of the world's developed economies, and the possible reversal of capital inflows once that monetary stimulus ends also represent risks to Asia.The Asian Development Bank also issued a stark warning on Asia's rapidly growing energy needs. The region, the bank said, is moving along a "dangerously unsustainable energy path" that "could result in environmental disaster" and increase the region's reliance on the oil-exporting nations of the Middle East."Asia could be consuming more than half the world's energy supply by 2035, and without radical changes carbon dioxide emissions will double," Mr. Rhee said. "Asia must both contain rising demand and explore cleaner energy options, which will require creativity and resolve, with policymakers having to grapple with politically difficult issues like fuel subsidies and regional energy market integration."
HONG KONG — Consumer prices rose less than expected last month in China as the unappetizing and widely televised spectacle of thousands of dead pigs floating upstream from Shanghai helped push pork prices down sharply, the government reported on Tuesday.The National Bureau of Statistics announced that consumer prices were 2.1 percent higher in March than a year ago. Prices had been 3.2 percent higher in February.Pork is a staple of the Chinese diet and its price has long been such a significant component of the country's consumer price index that it can influence overall inflation. Pork prices tumbled 5.5 percent last month from a year earlier, the National Bureau of Statistics said.Factories and other producers also faced falling prices last month. Producer prices in China were down 1.9 percent in March, compared with a year-over-year decline of 1.6 percent in February."Meat prices slumped due to concerns about mysterious pig deaths and bird-flu contagion risk," Asia economists at Standard Chartered said in a research report.Fitch Ratings separately expressed concern Tuesday evening about the long-term consequences for China's financial stability of the country's huge buildup in debt, particularly borrowing by local governments. Fitch reduced its default rating on China's long-term local currency debt to A+, from AA–.Fitch, however, maintained its rating on China's long-term foreign currency debt at A+, citing the country's $3.39 trillion in foreign currency reserves, compared with just $34 billion in foreign currency-denominated sovereign debt.The General Administration of Customs announced on Wednesday that China had a rare trade deficit of $884.3 million in March. Moody's Analytics said in a research report that the deficit reflected a lull in exports leaving Chinese docks as many factories closed for much of February to observe Chinese New Year, while imports continued to grow.Chinese policy makers have been struggling with two intertwined problems related to inflation.They allowed banks to engage in a large expansion of lending and off-balance sheet credit last autumn to reverse an economic slowdown. That expansion of credit fanned fears of inflation that has already brought a sharp appreciation in real estate prices in recent months, prompting the government to renew warnings about problems of housing affordability.But while asset prices may be rising, the price of goods has stayed weak, as many industries still face overcapacity. Companies have been unable to raise prices, often making it hard for them to make regular payments of interest and principal on their debts.Manufacturers in China say that while the cost of materials like steel has stabilized or even fallen, wages continue to increase. "Raw material prices have so far been stable, but we have had to increase worker wages by 20 percent," said Kevin Mao, the export business manager at the Zhejiang Zhongli Group, a manufacturer of bicycle and motorcycle locks in Wenzhou in east-central China.Randall Liu, a sales executive at Xiamen Tawa Enterprise, a maker of wine sacks and sleeping bags in Xiamen in southeastern China, said that weak demand for exports made it hard to raise prices to cover wage increases."We are only able to transfer a portion of our cost increases to our end customers, so we do take a hit on our margin," he said.Usha C. V. Haley, the director of the Robbins Center for Global Business and Strategy at West Virginia University, said in a speech in Hong Kong on Monday that industrial overcapacity was likely to persist in China, given numerous corporate subsidies provided by the national and provincial governments. "They do want to maintain social stability and create jobs," and so are unlikely to reduce subsidies, she said.Chinese and World Health Organization officials said Monday that they had not documented any evidence that pigs had been dying from a recent outbreak of H7N9 avian influenza, although an investigation into the deaths continued.The price of pork tends to follow long cycles in China that lag behind animal feed prices.When feed prices are high, farmers raise fewer pigs, which tends to push pork prices up and feed prices down. The cycle then reverses itself as farmers rush to raise more hogs before feed prices bounce up again.Pork prices were little changed in February, sustained by demand during the Chinese New Year, but had fallen sharply before then. Many economists had expected pork prices to begin strengthening this spring, however, before the carcasses began showing up near Shanghai. The drop in pork prices meant that overall consumer prices for all food rose only 2.7 percent in March from a year earlier, the National Bureau of Statistics said. Food prices had been up 6 percent in February. The National Bureau of Statistics has scheduled for next Monday the release of a long list of other economic statistics, including economic output during the first quarter of this year.
HONG KONG — The Chinese economic recovery lost some of its momentum during the first quarter of this year, official data released on Monday showed, surprising analysts who had expected growth to accelerate on the back of ample credit, strong infrastructure spending and firm exports.The economy expanded by just 7.7 percent during the first three months of the year, compared with a year earlier, short of the 8 percent that economists polled by Reuters had projected, and slower than during the previous three months, when gross domestic product rose 7.9 percent year-on-year.Industrial output data for March also underlined the fading momentum. Growth dropped to 8.9 percent compared with March 2012, well below expectations.The spokesman for the Chinese statistics bureau, Sheng Laiyun, played down the shortfall."Over all in the first quarter the economy had a steady start and has advanced in a stable way," Mr. Sheng said at a news conference in Beijing. "Generally, it's operating within the range of 7.4 percent to 7.9 percent — that is, steady growth."China's industrialization and urbanization would remain powerful engines for relatively rapid growth, Mr. Sheng said.Analysts had widely expected China's economy, the world's second biggest after the United States, to have picked up more steam during the first months of the year, as a tide of credit flowed into the economy, and government-mandated investment in infrastructure projects picked up.In fact, the growing scale of credit has begun to worry an increasing number of analysts, who warn that the resulting buildup of debt bears substantial risks, including asset price bubbles and potentially destabilizing defaults.Fitch Ratings last week expressed concerns about the long-term consequences for China's financial stability over the country's huge buildup in debt, particularly borrowing by local governments.
HONG KONG — China's newly installed leadership is facing a major challenge on the economic front, after data released Monday showed that the country's growth had unexpectedly lost momentum in the first quarter, complicating Beijing's efforts to promote higher-quality output that relies less on credit-fueled investment.China's economy expanded 7.7 percent during the first three months of this year, compared with a year earlier, falling well short of forecasts for an increase of 8 percent and slowing from 7.9 percent during the final quarter of 2012.Analysts described the data variously as "a big disappointment" and a "truckload of unpleasant surprises." Several banks — among them JPMorgan Chase, Royal Bank of Scotland and Société Générale — responded by markedly reducing their full-year growth forecasts for the Chinese economy.Stock markets, too, reacted negatively. The Shanghai composite index dropped 1.1 percent, the Hang Seng in Hong Kong fell 1.4 percent, and the Nikkei in Japan shed 1.5 percent. European markets also opened lower.The Chinese economy had been mired in a prolonged slowdown for much of 2011 and 2012 before it finally began to pick up some steam toward the end of last year. The data released Monday, however, suggest that the gradual recovery is proving more fragile than most analysts had expected."We have been expecting growth to slow down again, but not until the second half of the year," said Zhiwei Zhang, a China economist at the Japanese investment bank Nomura in Hong Kong. "The next couple of quarters will bring more headwinds, and growth will probably trend down even more."Investment data also disappointed, while industrial output figures for March, also released Monday, showed that factory output growth, compared with a year earlier, had sagged to the lowest level since August 2012, when fears of a "hard landing" in China were widespread.Mr. Zhang said the economy's lackluster first-quarter performance left policy makers in Beijing in the difficult position of having to strike a balance between maintaining solid growth and containing financial and property market risks. "I don't envy them," he said. "They have a very difficult job to do."Beijing is struggling to shift the economy gradually away from the exports and heavy investment that have been the main engines of growth in recent years, seeking instead to foster expansion that is driven more by domestic demand and that will bring higher living standards and greater productivity.The Chinese prime minister, Li Keqiang, who took office last month, summed up the challenges Friday."To come to grips with economic policy, we must both keep a steady footing and focus on upgrading," Mr. Li told a group of economists and business executives in Beijing, in comments reported Sunday by Xinhua, the state-run news agency."Since the start of the year, China's economic performance has, over all, made a steady start, and this will help to stabilize everyone's expectations," he said. "But at the same time, we must see that there are still quite a few unstable and uncertain factors in the domestic and international environment, and deep-seated problems are constantly arising."The flood of data Monday highlighted some of the uncertainties ahead.The pickup in growth in the past few months had been mainly the result of a rush of government-mandated infrastructure spending, as well as relatively firm exports. Liquidity also has been ample — so much so, in fact, that some analysts have warned that the resulting buildup of debt carried substantial risks, including asset price bubbles and potentially destabilizing defaults.Much of the new liquidity, however, appears to have been absorbed by borrowers seeking to service debts, rather than used for new investments or to take on new projects, according to Mr. Zhang of Nomura. He added that that might have been one reason that the first-quarter data had come in so much weaker than expected.
HONG KONG — Growth in China's important factory sector slowed in April, a closely watched monthly index released Tuesday showed, adding to concerns that the pace of overall economic growth in China may be faltering.The index, which was based on a survey of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector and was released by HSBC, was 50.5 points for April. That exceeded 50, the level that separates expansion from contraction, but fell below the 51.6 points recorded for March.The release is one of the earliest measures of business activity available for April and appears to indicate that an unexpected growth slowdown in the first quarter may be continuing into the second.China's first-quarter growth data, released by the authorities in Beijing last week, surprised analysts who said they had thought that the economy picked up speed in January, February and March. Instead, expansion slowed to 7.7 percent, down from 7.9 percent the previous quarter.The manufacturing survey released Tuesday reinforced the view that the pace of growth was unlikely to pick up again in the current quarter."The overall message" from the release "is that there was some improvement in the manufacturing sector" around the start of the fourth quarter of 2012, but that "the momentum then stalled" in the first quarter of this year, wrote Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong.Investors, unnerved by the disappointing reading, sent the mainland China stock market down 2.6 percent on Tuesday. In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index fell 1.1 percent.Weakening demand for exports bears part of the blame. Orders for new exports contracted in April after rebounding in March, suggesting that external demand for China's exporters remained weak, Qu Hongbin, an HSBC economist who specializes in China, said.Weaker overall demand has also started to weigh on employment in the manufacturing sector and is likely to prompt Beijing to respond with efforts to increase domestic investment and consumption, Mr. Qu added in a statement accompanying the index.
THAT frightening word "pandemic" is back in the news. A strain of avian influenza has infected people in China, with a death toll of more than 25 as of late last week. The outbreak raises renewed questions about how to prepare for possible risks, should the strain become more easily communicable or should other deadly variations arise.Our current health care policies are not optimal for dealing with pandemics. The central problem is that these policies neglect what economists call "public goods": items and services that benefit many people and can't easily be withheld from those who don't pay for them directly.Protection against communicable diseases is a core example of a public good, as is basic scientific research, which can yield new ideas that may be spread at very low additional cost. (In contrast, Medicare, which is publicly financed, has some elements of a public good, but any particular expenditure tends to benefit an individual receiving treatment, rather than being spread over a number of beneficiaries.)One obvious step forward would be to exempt biomedical research from cuts of the current federal budget sequestration. Research and development grants are a way to pay potential innovators up front — an important move, as an innovator can't always charge high-enough prices for the value of its remedies when they're actually needed.If a pandemic became a major issue in the United States, demand for remedies would surge far beyond the level associated with a typical seasonal flu outbreak, and permitting high prices would be unpopular — and perhaps unfair. The threat of contagion also makes it crucial to spread the net of protection as widely as possible, which again suggests low prices.Yet it is crucial to have some reward system in place for medical innovators. Well in advance of a pandemic, research needs to be done, and vaccine capacity and drug distribution facilities need to be built up. In the H.I.V./AIDS crisis, for instance, the United States was caught flat-footed — and an appropriate response has taken decades, in part because we were not prepared. Without government financing for such public goods, the capacity wouldn't be there if a new pandemic produced a surge in demand. This would amount to an institutional failure.The government could also take another, more unusual step: it could promise to pay lucrative prices for the patents on drugs and vaccines that prove useful in dealing with pandemics. The point of buying the patent is to distribute the remedy, if needed, as widely and as cheaply as possible. If the pandemic never occurs, the reward wouldn't have to be paid. But the very promise of such a reward might induce suppliers to take the risk of increasing capacity in advance.Without such a government promise, private patents could easily lead to very high prices and limited distribution, as has already occurred for some cancer drugs, which are being sold to patients for more than $100,000 a year.If anyone doubted a government pledge to pay big money for the rights to remedies, the patent's value could be established by a competitive auction. Michael Kremer, a Harvard economics professor, outlined the procedure for such an auction in his research paper "Patent Buyouts."The government should resist the strong temptation to skimp on rewards. Many health care breakthroughs come through university research programs and government grants, but bringing an innovation to fruition and managing wide and rapid distribution usually requires the profit-seeking private sector. In any single instance, the government could save money by confiscating rights, but in the longer run this would discourage the search for additional remedies.If anything, the American government — or, better yet, a consortium of governments — should pay more for pandemic remedies than what market-based auctions would yield. That's because, if a major pandemic does arise, other countries may not respect intellectual property rights as they scramble to copy a drug or vaccine for domestic distribution. To encourage innovations, policy makers need to bolster the expectation of rewards.How many drugs should we cover with such prizes, and then distribute free or at minimal charge? It's an interesting but perhaps insoluble moral question. But in the meantime, economics can offer practical advice. If the remedy is a public good, as is the case in fighting a communicable disease, the value of widespread treatment will make cheap distribution a good idea.Unfortunately, the United States lacks strong political coalitions for many beneficial public health measures. The Democratic Party has focused on insurance coverage and Medicaid expansion as political issues, while often wishing to lower prices of drugs or to weaken patent protection. The Obama administration's new budget lowers spending on pharmaceuticals by an estimated $164 billion over 10 years, mostly through bargaining down Medicare drug prices. That makes it hard for the Democrats to embrace lucrative rewards for pharmaceutical companies or vaccine producers.Nor can we expect much on pandemic preparation from the current Republican Party, which has been focusing its fiscal conservatism on discretionary spending. That means disproportionate cuts for public health and research and development. This decision can be seen as at odds with a true conservative philosophy, which usually embraces the provision of public goods like a strong military and general national security. Such goods can also serve the purpose of protecting against bioterror.OVER all, the American government seems to be turning its back on its traditional role of producing and investing in national public goods. If there is any consistent tendency in recent government spending, it is that spending on entitlements like Social Security and Medicare — which provide mostly private benefits — is rising and that investment and spending on national public goods is falling.As a budget category, "government consumption and gross investment" is a proxy for many kinds of public goods spending. As a share of gross domestic product, it has fallen to less than 19 percent, from a peak of 24 percent in the 1980s, with no expected reversal in sight. Yet total government spending is expected to increase because of income transfers and entitlements. Neither political party seems able to halt that logic or even cares to make an issue of it.Focusing government on the production of public goods may sound like a trivial issue, too obvious to be worth a mention. But, in fact, we have been failing at it, and the consequences could be serious indeed.
HONG KONG — Trade figures for April released by the Chinese government on Wednesday morning were slightly better than economists expected, but still indicated that demand was fairly weak in foreign markets and in China itself.Exports and imports both increased last month compared with a year earlier, but the figures were harder than usual to interpret because April of last year was so weak. Imports and exports all but stopped growing in April of last year as a wide range of industries, perceiving a short, sharp domestic economic slowdown that would last until early autumn, stopped buying industrial commodities, even as foreign buyers cut orders as well.Compared with that weak base, China's trade figures for last month looked somewhat better. Exports rose 14.7 percent from a year ago, while imports increased 16.8 percent.But the trade figures were far from strong enough to suggest that foreign demand could pull China out of what seems to be a deepening economic malaise. Although official figures still show the economy steaming along at a growth rate of nearly 8 percent, a range of purchasing manager surveys last month showed growing worry among business executives across China."China is in a very difficult position now," as American and European consumers seem wary of further increases in the coming months in their purchases of Chinese goods, said Diana Choyleva, an economist in the Hong Kong office of Lombard Street Research, an economic analysis firm.The discouraging shift in sentiment, after a fairly weak economic performance in March as well, comes despite enormous lending through the autumn, winter and early spring. China's leaders were able to turn the sharp economic slowdown a year around by flooding the economy with bank and trust loans, and other credit.But the heavy lending has brought about considerably less economic growth than earlier rounds of monetary easing, raising worries that China's investment-dominated economy is running out of economically viable projects to pursue and may not be able to shift quickly enough to consumer-led growth.China has scheduled the release of April inflation data on Thursday, and a wide range of April economic statistics next Monday, including including industrial production, fixed asset investment and retail sales.Another uncertainty about Wednesday's trade data lies in whether the export figures are even accurate, or whether they have been artificially inflated. A gradual rise in the value of the renminbi against the dollar over the last year, together with expectations that this rise will continue, has created an incentive for exporters to overstate the value of the goods they ship out of the country, as a way to bypass China's currency controls and bring more dollars into the country to convert into renminbi.The Chinese government has opened an investigation into whether exporters are overinvoicing clients, after export data in the first quarter showed unusual patterns, including a surge in reported Chinese exports to Hong Kong that did not match Hong Kong data.Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, estimated that overinvoicing of exports accounted for more than half of the year-on-year growth in China's exports last month. By adjusting for this, he said that the true growth in China's exports last month appeared to be more like 5.7 percent than 14.7 percent.There has been little sign of manipulation of import figures, which appear to show that domestic demand is holding up a little better than overseas demand.
HONG KONG — The Australian central bank dropped its key interest rate to a record-low 2.75 percent Tuesday, becoming the latest central bank in recent weeks to try to stimulate growth.Few analysts had expected the central bank, the Reserve Bank of Australia, to deliver a rate cut at its policy meeting, and the reduction, by a quarter of a percentage point, prompted the Australian dollar to decline about half a cent against the U.S. dollar, to $1.019.In a statement accompanying the rate decision, Glenn Stevens, the central bank's governor, struck a sanguine note about the global economy, saying it was "likely to record growth a little below trend this year before picking up next year," with the United States currently on a path of moderate expansion and China's growth running at a robust pace. And although commodity prices — which are important to resource-rich Australia — have moderated in recent months, they "remain high by historical standards," he added.Still, unemployment has edged up despite a string of rate cuts in recent years, and investment in mining, a major source of economic activity, is projected to peak this year.A persistently strong Australian dollar has weighed on the economy. The currency has climbed against the U.S. dollar for much of the past 12 years, with only a brief slump after the Lehman Brothers collapse in late 2008, and reached parity with the U.S. dollar for the first time since 1982 in late 2010. It has been worth more than $1 for much of the time since then.The exchange rate's strength over the past 18 months, Mr. Stevens said, "is unusual, given the decline in export prices and interest rates during that time." The central bank thus decided that "a further decline in the cash rate was appropriate to encourage sustainable growth in the economy," he continued.The fact that inflation in Australia, at 2.5 percent during the first quarter of this year, remains within the central bank's comfort level also provided the leeway for a reduction in interest rates, analysts said. The rate cut Tuesday was the seventh by the Australian central bank since November 2011 and took the total reduction in borrowing costs to 2 percentage points."Further easing looks unlikely at the moment," analysts at Standard Chartered said in a research note, adding that the central bank was likely to wait for more data before making further moves. "However, continued sluggishness in both the domestic and global economies will increase the risk of a rate cut, inflation permitting," they said.The Australian move follows recent efforts in several other regions and countries to prop up growth. Both the European Central Bank and the Reserve Bank of India lowered borrowing costs last week in a bid to bolster growth, which has been flagging. And in Japan, the central bank and the government have announced spending plans and asset purchases and have promised measures to attract investment in an effort to combat deflation and reignite growth.
HONG KONG — The Australian central bank dropped its key interest rate to a record-low 2.75 percent Tuesday, becoming the latest central bank in recent weeks to try to stimulate growth.Few analysts had expected the central bank, the Reserve Bank of Australia, to deliver a rate cut at its policy meeting, and the reduction, by a quarter of a percentage point, prompted the Australian dollar to decline about half a cent against the U.S. dollar, to $1.019.In a statement accompanying the rate decision, Glenn Stevens, the central bank's governor, struck a sanguine note about the global economy, saying it was "likely to record growth a little below trend this year before picking up next year," with the United States currently on a path of moderate expansion and China's growth running at a robust pace. And although commodity prices — which are important to resource-rich Australia — have moderated in recent months, they "remain high by historical standards," he added.Still, unemployment has edged up despite a string of rate cuts in recent years, and investment in mining, a major source of economic activity, is projected to peak this year.A persistently strong Australian dollar has weighed on the economy. The currency has climbed against the U.S. dollar for much of the past 12 years, with only a brief slump after the Lehman Brothers collapse in late 2008, and reached parity with the U.S. dollar for the first time since 1982 in late 2010. It has been worth more than $1 for much of the time since then.The exchange rate's strength over the past 18 months, Mr. Stevens said, "is unusual, given the decline in export prices and interest rates during that time." The central bank thus decided that "a further decline in the cash rate was appropriate to encourage sustainable growth in the economy," he continued.The fact that inflation in Australia, at 2.5 percent during the first quarter of this year, remains within the central bank's comfort level also provided the leeway for a reduction in interest rates, analysts said. The rate cut Tuesday was the seventh by the Australian central bank since November 2011 and took the total reduction in borrowing costs to 2 percentage points."Further easing looks unlikely at the moment," analysts at Standard Chartered said in a research note, adding that the central bank was likely to wait for more data before making further moves. "However, continued sluggishness in both the domestic and global economies will increase the risk of a rate cut, inflation permitting," they said.The Australian move follows recent efforts in several other regions and countries to prop up growth. Both the European Central Bank and the Reserve Bank of India lowered borrowing costs last week in a bid to bolster growth, which has been flagging. And in Japan, the central bank and the government have announced spending plans and asset purchases and have promised measures to attract investment in an effort to combat deflation and reignite growth.
HONG KONG — Brightly hued men's underwear in a rainbow of colors is no longer selling well in Europe for the Zhongtian Garments Company in Xiamen, China. Exports are down 30 percent in the last year.Children's guitars with bodies resembling cats and cartoon characters are losing their charm for Yuesen Musical Instrument Factory in Huainan, China. And at the Yuzhongniao Outdoor Products Company in Jinjiang, domestic sales and exports alike are declining this year. The Canton Fair, China's biggest export event, ended on Sunday with few new orders. "We are not even getting many people browsing this time," said Alice Hong, Yuzhongniao's sales manager.After a powerful recovery through the autumn and winter from a V-shaped downturn last summer, China's economy is unexpectedly faltering once again. Exports are weak. The country's domestic economy is still growing mostly because of huge increases in lending by state-controlled banks and a surge in off-balance sheet lending. Consumer spending is rising, but not fast enough to offset weakness in other sectors.That combination has prompted growing concerns among economists and business executives about the sustainability of even 7.5 percent growth in China in the coming years, the government's current goal after three decades of double-digit growth with only a few interruptions.The latest sign of trouble came on Wednesday, when China's General Administration of Customs announced export and import figures for April. On the surface, they looked fairly respectable: exports were up 14.7 percent from a year earlier, and imports were up 16.8 percent.But April 2012 was an exceptionally bad month for Chinese exports and imports — indeed, dismal trade statistics for that month were the first sign that economic weakness during the preceding winter was turning into a precipitous decline.This April's trade figures appeared even weaker when economists looked closer and found that the export growth had been largely propelled by growth in exports to Hong Kong, up 57 percent, and to special customs zones in China for export later, up even faster.Since Hong Kong's own data has not been showing large increases in imports from China so far this year, the Chinese government has already opened an investigation into whether exporters are overinvoicing for shipments. Overstating exports can allow companies to evade currency controls and move money into China to profit from the gradual appreciation of the renminbi against the dollar.Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, estimated that with the exclusion of overinvoicing, export growth came to only 5.7 percent.Over the last few years, economists have tended to pay less attention to China's exports because they were declining as a share of the country's total economic output, because of weak overseas demand. But newer research suggests that China may still be dependent on exports.The reason is that multinationals have been rapidly localizing their purchases of various items like computer chips and auto parts in China instead of importing them from other Asian neighbors. So while total exports may not have been rising quickly in recent years in China, the Chinese content in each dollar of exports has been increasing.Mr. Kuijs estimated that 20.7 percent of China's economic output came from exports last year, a figure that had bottomed out in 2009 at 19.7 percent.In a bad sign for exports in the months ahead, the Canton Fair announced this week that export orders placed at this year's spring session had fallen 1.4 percent from a year ago. It was the latest sign that steeply rising blue-collar wages in China and a gradually appreciating currency are starting to erode the country's international competitiveness; foreign investment in China has also begun to level off, while surging in lower-wage countries in the region, like Cambodia and Vietnam.Li Yong, the general manager at Yuesen Musical, said that many Japanese, Taiwanese and Korean companies in his industry had recently moved to Indonesia as costs climbed in China.
HONG KONG — Japan's Nikkei 225 stock index, which has been on a tear for months amid optimism over government efforts to breathe life into Japan's listless economy, rose another 2.3 percent on Wednesday and closed above 15,000 points for the first time in five and a half years.Japanese stocks have soared since November, when Shinzo Abe, who took over as prime minister in December, vowed to pursue aggressive steps to combat persistent deflation and lift the economy out of years of feeble growth.Adding to the momentum on Wednesday was a 10.6 percent surge in the shares of Sony; the company on Tuesday came under pressure from the investor and billionaire hedge fund manager Daniel S. Loeb to spin off part of its entertainment arm.Mr. Loeb argued that the move would allow to sharpen its focus and lead to higher profit margins, while helping revive the core electronics business.Sony shares, which have rallied strongly this year, in part because a weaker yen has improved its earnings prospects, were worth ¥2,072, or $20.28, apiece by the close of trading in Tokyo on Wednesday, more than twice where they began the year. That is the highest since July 2011.The yen's fall on the currencies markets — the Japanese currency has dropped about 17 percent against the U.S. dollar so far this year — has been a major boon to Japanese exporters, whose goods and services have become cheaper for customers abroad as a result.Numerous companies have in recent weeks cited the weaker yen as a reason for improved earnings, helping to lift the overall stock market.Since the start of the year, the Nikkei 225 has risen more than 40 percent, and on Wednesday the index closed at 15,096 points.The yen was trading at 102.37 to the dollar, compared with ¥86.67 per dollar at the start of the year.Meanwhile, gross domestic product data for the first three months of 2013, due out Thursday, also are likely to illustrate Japan's improved prospects.The figures are expected to show that the Japanese economy grew 0.7 percent from the previous quarter, according to analysts polled by Reuters.Mr. Abe "wasted no time launching the first two 'arrows' of his three-pronged economic agenda, delivering bold fiscal and monetary stimulus that has weakened the JPY and lifted equities to five year highs," Izumi Devalier, Japan economist at HSBC, wrote in a research note on Wednesday, referring to the Japanese currency.But Ms. Devalier also struck a note of skepticism, saying the long-term success of what has been dubbed "Abenomics" hinged on "the third and most important arrow — structural reforms.""Deep reforms," she wrote, "are in danger of being shelved due to push back from bureaucrats, unions, and even pockets of Abe's own party."
HONG KONG — The Japanese government struck a more confident note on the economy's prospects Monday, and a survey showed that manufacturing sentiment had turned positive for the first time in a year — the latest sign that Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's policies were taking hold.In its latest monthly assessment of economic activity, the cabinet said the economy was "picking up slowly." The wording represented an upgrade from the report of the previous month, when the government spoke of recent signs of a pickup but also commented that weaknesses remained in some areas.At the same time, a monthly poll measuring sentiment in the manufacturing sector, published by Reuters, jumped 11 points to plus-7 in May — the highest reading since September 2011 and the first reading above zero in a year. Readings above zero show that optimistic responses outnumber pessimistic responses.Since taking office in December, Mr. Abe has pursued a three-pronged strategy for resuscitating growth in the Japanese economy, the world's third-largest economy, after those of the United States and China.The first two of the so-called "arrows" with which he is fighting economic malaise — major spending programs and monetary policy that has effectively flooded the economy with cheap money — have already helped weaken the yen and set off a remarkable rally in the Japanese stock market. The Nikkei 225 index climbed another 1.5 percent Monday, increasing its gains since the start of 2013 to nearly 48 percent. The weaker yen, meanwhile, has meant a windfall for exporters.The policies helped bring about "a V-shaped recovery," Akira Amari, the minister in charge of economic revitalization, said in a televised news briefing Monday.Data released last week, showing that the economy had grown at an annualized pace of 3.5 percent in the first quarter of this year, more than analysts had expected, provided one of the first indications that Mr. Abe's policies were bearing fruit.Solid earnings outlooks from Japanese companies in recent weeks also have underlined the positive effects of the weaker yen. The yen has dropped about 30 percent against the U.S. dollar since November 2012, helping to improve the international competitiveness of Japanese corporations.At the same time, however, many analysts have cautioned that the "third arrow" — structural overhauls to make the economy more competitive — will be needed if the turnaround is to be sustainable over the long term.Mr. Amari, speaking Monday morning, acknowledged that more work needed to be done. Corporate capital expenditure, for example, remained in negative territory, he said. He added that the government would focus on creating a pro-business environment that would swiftly increase spending.Meanwhile, the Japanese central bank, whose announcement April 4 that it would aggressively buy longer-term bonds as part of a major bid to combat crippling deflation, is expected to hold off on any more stimulus action at its next policy meeting this week.
HONG KONG — A 7 percent stock market sell-off in Tokyo led to moderate declines in equity markets across Europe and Asia on Thursday, and Wall Street opened weakly, amid concerns about global growth and uneasiness about central bank actions.Shares came under pressure in Asian trading after news that the manufacturing sector in China, one of the main engines of global growth in recent years, was faltering. That, along with concerns about daring shock therapy Japan is employing to restart its economy after two decades of stagnation, further combined with leftover confusion in financial markets about the U.S. Federal Reserve's intentions following testimony Wednesday by its chairman, helped to further rattle investors.The result was a 7.3 percent rout in the Japanese market benchmark, the Nikkei 225-stock average, and other Asian markets followed. The Hang Seng Index in Hong Kong sagged 2.5 percent, and the Sydney benchmark index fell almost 2 percent.In European afternoon trading, the Euro Stoxx 50 index of euro zone blue chips fell 2.5 percent, while the FTSE 100 in London was down 2 percent. On Wall Street, the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index was down more than 1 percent in morning trading, while the Dow Jones industrial average lost 0.6 percent. The Nasdaq was off 0.8 percent.The euro ticked up 0.2 percent against the dollar, to $1.2887. The dollar fell 1.4 percent against the Japanese currency, to 101.74 yen.China's slowing momentum has been long in the making and is, to some extent, deliberately engineered by the authorities in Beijing, who are trying to bring about a more gradual but more balanced pace of growth. Still, disappointments over the performance of China's economy – the second-largest in the world after that of the United States – remain liable to unsettle markets not just in Asia but around the globe.High hopes that the bold economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan will succeed have prompted a huge rally in stocks since November. The Japanese market is still up nearly 40 percent since the start of the year.Akira Amari, Japan's economy minister, sought to calm nerves after the market closed Thursday. "The Japanese economy is staging a sound recovery, and there is no need for panic," he said, according to the Nikkei business daily. The plunge "is not exceedingly large, and stock prices in China, where the shock originated, have not fallen so much either," he added."The stock market's rise has so far been largely driven by expectations of an economic turnaround, but we've yet to see Mr. Abe's policies really gain traction," said Kiyoshi Yoshimoto, chief senior economist at the Japan Research Institute in Tokyo. "That means even small shocks, like lower-than-expected numbers out of China or some volatility in bond markets, can trigger a big but temporary response."The sell-off Thursday came in spite of economic news from Europe that was, if not good, at least better than many expected. The Markit Economics euro zone purchasing managers' index for the manufacturing sector rose to 47.8 from 46.7, while the services index rose to 47.5 from 47.0. While a number below 50 indicates continued contraction, the improvement suggests the economy may be getting nearer to its nadir, setting up conditions for a rebound in the second half.In Hong Kong, Stephen Corry, chief investment strategist at LGT, agreed that a combination of negative news helped spur the sell-off, including the disappointing data from China and signs that the Fed may begin to scale back its stimulus efforts. But the Japanese market had rallied more than 14 percent this month alone, he added, and "was probably due a breather."Analysts have broadly welcomed Mr. Abe's efforts to breathe life into the Japanese economy through a three-pronged approach of major fiscal spending, a promise to pursue structural reforms and a monetary policy that has effectively flooded the economy with cheap money through purchases of government bonds, commercial debt and other assets.One result has been a weakening of the yen, whose 17 percent drop against the dollar since the start of this year has helped lift the earnings prospects of many Japanese exporters. Data released in the past few weeks have shown that the economy has begun to pick up speed.Taking many market observers by surprise, however, bond yields have risen in recent days, fanning worries about a rising interest rate burden for the government. The yield on the 10-year Japanese government bond briefly spiked above 1 percent Thursday before dropping back to 0.9 percent. The move spooked investors, helping produce the fall in the stock markets, said Stephen Davies, chief executive of Javelin Wealth Management in Singapore.Japan is vulnerable to rising borrowing costs because of its high public debt, which is twice the size of its economy. Bonds are also the main financial assets held by banks, pension funds and insurance companies, making a surge in debt yields perilous. Given the indebtedness of the Japanese government, there are worries about the impact that this could have if sustained," Mr. Davies said. "It is too early to say whether it will be sustained, so we should not read too much into one day's extreme move in the markets."Mr. Yoshimoto of the Japan Research Institute also said the sharp market moves Thursday had not changed the overall longer-term picture for recovery in Japan. That could change if Mr. Abe fails to follow through on his promises of economic reforms, he said, "but for now, there's no need to become overly pessimistic about Japanese shares."
HONG KONG — The Japanese central bank on Monday released minutes of a recent meeting that showed some board members skeptical of the bank's own strategy of lifting Japan from deflation, while another big fall in the country's stock market stoked fears of further volatility in the weeks and months ahead.But European stocks shrugged off the slide on the Japanese stock market Monday and traded higher as a member of the European Central Bank repeated the bank's commitment to low interest rates. Stock markets in Britain and the United States were closed for public holidays.In Tokyo, the minutes of the Bank of Japan's policy meeting on April 26 revealed a degree of doubt about the bank's ability to inject a healthy dose of inflation into an economy that has suffered from crippling deflation for years.According to the minutes, "a few members" pointed out that the goal of 2 percent inflation appeared "difficult to achieve" in the planned time frame of about two years, "since it was highly uncertain whether changes in inflation expectations would lead to a rise in the actual rate of inflation."Some board members also noted that the bank's aggressive easing policies appeared to have been perceived by the markets as "contradictory" — comments that highlighted the challenges that the bank and policy makers are wrestling with.The bank, on one hand, has committed to ending deflationary expectations and starting an economic recovery by flooding the economy with money, which would cause long-term interest rates to rise. But the bank has also committed to keeping those interest rates in check, partly by buying large amounts of government bonds. That has sowed confusion among market players over whether they should welcome or worry about the recent rise in long-term rates.On Monday, the Nikkei 225 share average in Tokyo fell 3.2 percent. The decline came after a 7.3 percent slump last Thursday, when a rally that started in mid-November of 2012, with stocks rising nearly 80 percent, came to an abrupt end."While it's still difficult to clearly pinpoint a reason, the big market falls themselves have started to stoke fear among investors," Koichi Fujishiro, an economist at the Dai-ichi Life Research Institute, said in a report. He said that high-frequency trading by investors looking for short-term gains helped magnify those market swings."Japan's fundamentals have not changed," Mr. Fujishiro said. But, he added, "turmoil in financial markets won't settle down overnight, and we are likely to see nervousness remain for some time."An article carried by the Nikkei business daily on Monday urged calm."Investors need a bird's-eye perspective of market movements, not a bug's-eye perspective," wrote Ryo Suzuki, a columnist who is a member of Nikkei's editorial board. "Things look different from a larger perspective," he said. "For people who sat out on the market surge, this might be a good time to get in on the action."Japanese stocks have been on a tear since last November, swept by a wave of optimism that bold plans outlined by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took over in December, would succeed in breathing life back into the Japanese economy.Volatility in the Japanese bond markets, a renewed strengthening of the yen and concern about the dynamism of China's economy all have combined in recent days to underline the challenges facing Mr. Abe and the Japanese central bank as they seek to renew growth.Analysts have struggled to explain the exact cause of the recent reversal, saying that a range of factors were probably at play and continue to fan nervousness in the market."There have been times when the market jumped over 1,000 points in a week. We were bound to see a correction," Yoshihide Suga, the chief cabinet secretary, told reporters in Tokyo. "But Japan's economy is recovering steadily. So it is extremely important that we react in a calm manner."Investors are also concerned that the United States Federal Reserve might reduce its own stimulus measures before too long.The realization that Mr. Abe's stimulus efforts — in particular, the structural overhauls that are needed to bolster Japan's long-term competitiveness — face a struggle also have played a part, analysts said, as did profit-taking after the long rally this year."Investors have realized that the Japanese market does not just rise and rise," said Jun Yunoki, an analyst at Nomura in Tokyo.
HONG KONG — Two surveys that take the temperature of China's manufacturing sector showed an economy that appears to have stabilized for now, but that is struggling to recover some of the momentum it lost at the start of the year.The two purchasing managers' indexes — one released by the British bank HSBC on Monday, the other published by the Chinese statistics bureau on Saturday — painted somewhat divergent pictures for May, though both underlined the fact that the factory sector was still struggling with lackluster demand.The official survey, which is focused more on large and midsize state-owned companies of the kind that benefit from state-led investment, provided a positive surprise by edging up slightly, to 50.8 in May, from 50.6 in April. Economists polled by Reuters had expected the index to slip toward 50, with figures above indicating expansion and those below showing contraction.On the other hand, the final version of the HSBC index for May, compiled by the research firm Markit and released Monday, was 49.2 points. The reading was a downward revision from the preliminary number of 49.6, which was published on May 23, and showed conditions at their weakest in eight months. The HSBC gauge is more focused on smaller companies, which have benefited less than their larger counterparts from the recent credit expansion, HSBC said in a research note."Overall conditions for China's manufacturing sector were at best stabilizing at a relatively low level in May," HSBC economists said, adding that a batch of official economic data for May, to be released this coming weekend, could provide more clarity on China's growth outlook.After years of double-digit expansion, China's pace of growth has cooled in recent years — a slowdown that has in part been engineered by the authorities in Beijing as they try to ease a potentially worrisome flood of lending, forestall asset price bubbles and direct the economy toward higher-quality expansion.Beijing is expecting 7.5 percent growth this year, a rapid clip compared with the rates of expansion of other leading economies but a significantly slower pace than the 9.3 percent growth in 2011 and the 10.4 percent in 2010."While the data may ease some concerns of rapid deteriorating of the Chinese economy, the impact may be short-lived," economists at the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group in Hong Kong said in a research note on the official purchasing managers' index. They added that structural reforms were needed to help sustain growth prospects.
HONG KONG — Chinese exports showed only modest growth in May, rising just 1 percent from a year earlier, officials said Saturday, an increase that was much lower than analysts' expectations.In April, the increase was 14.7 percent, a figure that was believed to have been artificially inflated. Before Saturday's figure came out, analysts expected Chinese exports to have risen at least 7 percent in May.Concern is rising about the sputtering Chinese economy and tightening liquidity. The European Union, China's biggest trading partner, remains mired in a stubborn economic downturn, while in the United States, China's next-largest export market, the Federal Reserve has recently been sending signals it may start curtailing its stimulative monetary policies.China's figures showed it had a trade surplus of $20.4 billion in May, up from $19.3 billion, as imports declined 0.3 percent, the Customs Administration said. The drop in imports — however slight — was a possible sign of weakness in the domestic economy.Chinese stocks declined last week, their first weekly decline in six weeks, amid signs of tightening liquidity within China. A clearer picture of the Chinese economy is expected Sunday, when the government releases data on retail sales, industrial output and inflation.Economists had expected the May figures to show a slowdown, as the government has begun a campaign to prevent companies from overstating their exports. Many businesses are believed to have done so in March and April as a way to bypass currency controls and bring more money into the country to speculate on further appreciation of China's renminbi.The main evidence for such strategies lay in official statistics showing soaring exports to Hong Kong and bonded export zones on the mainland even as exports to the rest of the world from these places remained weak.Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, had estimated in May that more than half of the officially reported growth of 14.7 percent in April from a year earlier was the result of companies' manipulating their statistics to place bets on the Chinese currency. The true rate of export growth in April, without the effects of these strategies, was more like 5.7 percent.The sharp slowdown in export growth in May "in part reflects the impact of a clampdown by the government on firms dressing up financial inflows as exports," Mr. Kuijs said in an e-mail on Saturday.Chinese customs data compiled by CEIC Data in Hong Kong showed that the mainland's exports to Hong Kong were up only 7.7 percent in May from a year earlier. In April, they had been up 57.2 percent from the same month last year, and in March they had been up 92.9 percent.Changing expectations about China's currency — fewer businesspeople now expect further appreciation — may have also reduced the incentive for companies to overstate exports, Mr. Kuijs said.
HONG KONG — After weathering the global financial crisis better than any other large economy, China is now showing signs of slackening growth despite heavy lending from state-owned banks and extensive government investment programs.Industrial production fell last month to its lowest growth rate since last September, data released over the weekend showed. Imports, mainly materials needed by factories, and fixed-asset investment both fell in May to their weakest growth since last August, when the economy was still mired in a sharp but deep summer slowdown.Producer prices, typically measured at the factory gate, have declined year-on-year every month for 15 months in a row and have accelerated downward through March, April and May. Chronic overcapacity has set off price wars even as blue-collar wages continue to rise.The May reports "have confirmed that the economy is stuck in stagnant growth again after quite a brief rebound" over the winter, said Xianfang Ren, a senior economist in the Beijing office of IHS, a global consulting firm. "Demand-side indicators are unanimously weak, with extremely weak exports growth and continued slide of fixed-asset investment growth."China's difficulties have global significance because the country has emerged as the world's largest consumer of many goods, including items like copper, steel, cars and cellphones.Economists from a number of international organizations and banks have been marking down their forecasts for Chinese economic performance this year, predicting growth of about 7.7 percent. That would be a robust pace by most countries' standards but is weak for China, where many businesses and families became accustomed to double-digit growth over most of the last three decades.Beijing's official target is 7.5 percent growth this year, but the country has often beaten targets in the past. Western economists, however, have long accused China of smoothing its data, understating true growth during boom years but also overstating it during downturns.In interviews over the last month, executives in China described being discouraged about overseas demand, although they are not yet nearly as worried as they were at the bottom of the global financial crisis in 2009. Some are also expressing the beginnings of concern about the health of domestic demand."Our export business has come down from last year and is not great, though still at acceptable levels," said Eric Tang, the sales manager for Suqian Green Glove, a manufacturer of vinyl gloves for medical examinations and food processing in Suqian, in east-central China. "Our domestic business is a small part of our overall activity and is middling along as well."A few executives say they already see considerable distress in their industrial sectors. Zhumadian City Kangmao Arts and Crafts, a 1,500-employee manufacturer of fabric shopping bags and backpacks in central China, has had to cut prices by a fifth in recent months because of lack of demand, particularly from overseas buyers."Our business has dropped greatly since the start of this year," said Wang Xuexin, the vice general manager.All the same, there are still signs of strength in the Chinese economy. Retail sales were up 12.9 percent in May, marginally better than the increase of 12.8 percent in April. Government spending on new rail lines and other infrastructure has also been strong, even as companies have cut back on manufacturing and real estate investments.Some executives say that their companies are fine, even as they acknowledge broader economic troubles. "While our factory is doing all right, many of our peers in the industry have had to deal with problems related to overcapacity and falling prices," said Sam Xu, a sales manager at the Yongkang Yongxin Industry and Trade, a maker of physical fitness equipment in Yongkang, in southeastern China.
HONG KONG — The battered Japanese stock market lurched into bear-market territory Thursday, after a tumble of 6.4 percent took the combined decline in the Nikkei 225 index since a peak on May 23 to more than 21 percent.A pronounced sell-off in the morning and early afternoon accelerated shortly before the markets closed in Tokyo. The Nikkei ended down more than 840 points at 12,445.38, its lowest level since early April.Global markets reacted badly at first, with the Euro Stoxx 50, a benchmark for euro zone blue chips, down almost 2 percent in morning trading. But European shares later recovered most of their losses, and stocks on Wall Street opened quietly after new reports showed recent improvements in the American economy.The drop in Japan on Thursday was one of many sharp declines seen in recent weeks, since a feverish six-month rally in Japanese stocks — incited by optimism over the government's aggressive efforts to reinvigorate the listless economy — came to an abrupt end.The Nikkei 225 soared more than 80 percent between mid-November and mid-May, but staged a sudden about-face with a 7.3 percent plunge on May 23.Sentiment has been fragile and trading volatile ever since, as investors have taken stock of the challenges that face "Abenomics," the economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, and weighed the pros and cons of taking profits after the rally.A renewed rise in the yen also has eroded a factor that, for months, had worked to support Japanese stocks. The yen weakened substantially between November and May – a welcome development for Japanese exporters as it made their goods less expensive for customers overseas.But the currency's move, like that of the stock market, reversed in late May. On Thursday, the yen traded around 94.00 to the American dollar, its strongest level since early April.In Tokyo, Yoshihide Suga, the chief cabinet secretary, brushed off the market plunge."I feel it's important not to swing from joy to sorrow every time stock prices rise or fall, and keep on doing what we need to do," Mr. Suga said at a news conference Thursday morning, as shares fell. "The Japanese economy is steadily improving.''The Bank of Japan governor, Haruhiko Kuroda, met with Mr. Abe on Thursday to exchange views on the economy, according to local news reports. Mr. Abe told the governor he was determined to do his part in putting a growth plan into action, Mr. Kuroda later told reporters. Mr. Kuroda told the prime minister that the central bank was committed to supporting the Japanese economy through monetary stimulus.Mr. Kuroda also said he expected markets to soon "calm down to reflect positive developments in the economy," according to the Nikkei Web site. On Monday, the Japanese government revised its first-quarter gross domestic product figures, saying its economy grew at an annualized pace of 4.1 percent between January and March, better than the 3.5 percent it initially reported. But that upgrade has not been enough to calm investor jitters.Factors beyond Japan also have helped send markets lower around the world.In China, which is a key engine of global growth, the flow of economic data in recent weeks has reinforced the picture of an economy that is struggling to regain momentum.And in the United States, comments on May 22 by Ben S. Bernanke, the chairman of the Federal Reserve, that he and his colleagues might consider paring back their bond-buying programs "in the next few meetings" if the economy shows signs of improvement have helped fan global nervousness. Investors and analysts have struggled to assess the implications of even a small withdrawal of the bond buying that has supported markets in recent years.In the United States, the Dow Jones industrial average and the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index have sagged 3.2 percent and 4 percent, respectively, in the past three weeks. The DAX in Germany has fallen about 4.5 percent and the CAC 40 in France has dropped more than 6 percent.Key markets in the Asia-Pacific region have tumbled even more. The Straits Times index in Singapore and the S.&P./ASX 200 in Australia have lost more than 9 percent since May 22, and in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng has shed more than 10 percent.A pessimistic outlook issued Wednesday by the World Bank added to the gloom, with Kaushik Basu, the bank's chief economist, noting in a news release that "the slowdown in the real economy is turning out to be unusually protracted."The bank, based in Washington, cut its forecast for global growth to 2.2 percent from a January forecast of 2.4 percent growth.In explaining the revision, Mr. Basu cited high unemployment in the developed world and slower-than-expected growth in emerging economies. He also noted that India was expanding at a rate below 6 percent for the first time in a decade.
HONG KONG — Chinese trade data for June came in much weaker than expected on Wednesday, offering up the latest evidence that the Chinese economy has lost much of its previous vigor.Exports fell 3.1 percent from a year earlier — the first drop since early 2012 — the customs department reported, and imports decreased 0.7 percent, falling for the second month in a row. Both figures were far below the expectations of analysts, who had projected a 4 percent rise in exports and an 8 percent climb in imports.The weak import data underlined slack demand within China. The export slump reflected weak overseas demand, but analysts said it was also partly attributable to a recent government crackdown on false export reporting by companies that had been seeking to bypass currency controls and move money into the country as a way to place a bet on further appreciation of the currency, the renminbi. The strengthening currency and rising wages in China have helped erode the country's competitiveness at a time when demand from export markets like the United States remains lackluster.Growth in China has been cooling for many months as the new leadership in Beijing seeks to shift the economy away from a credit-driven and increasingly outdated growth model. For years, China has relied on heavy manufacturing, state-sponsored investment and exports to power growth. Aware of the limits of these growth drivers, China is now seeking to foster more domestic demand and raise productivity.Policy makers have also been seeking to rein in the rapid credit growth that has built up in recent years.
HONG KONG — Chinese trade data for June came in much weaker than expected on Wednesday, offering the latest evidence that China has lost much of its economic vigor as Beijing seeks to steer the economy toward steadier, but slower, expansion.Exports fell 3.1 percent from the same period a year earlier — the first drop since early 2012 — the customs department reported, and imports decreased 0.7 percent, falling for the second month in a row. Both figures were far below the expectations of analysts, who had projected a 4 percent increase in exports and an 8 percent climb in imports, according to Reuters.The weak import growth reflected slack domestic demand within China, where a cash crunch engineered by the central authorities last month has weighed on bank lending.The slump in exports in recent months, meanwhile, is partly attributable to a government crackdown on false export reporting by companies that had been seeking to bypass currency controls and move money into the country as a way to place a bet on further appreciation of the renminbi, analysts said.But while that effect may now have been largely squeezed out of the data, several other factors are likely to continue to weigh on Chinese exports in the longer term.Demand from markets like the United States and Europe remains lackluster, for example, while rising wages and a gradual increase in the value of the renminbi mean China is no longer as competitive as it once was. The renminbi has risen more than 10 percent against the U.S. dollar since mid-2010, when the authorities allowed the currency to fluctuate more widely against the dollar.The weakness in the trade data, some analysts said Wednesday, could prompt Beijing to stop the renminbi from rising much further. Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong, said she expected the renminbi to weaken slightly, to 6.17 per dollar by the end of this year, from about 6.13 now.Over all, however, the new leadership in Beijing appears ready to tolerate some economic pain while it pursues the longer-term gain of a more balanced economy. Growth in China has been cooling for many months as the authorities seek to shift the economy away from a credit-driven and increasingly outdated growth model. For years, China has relied on heavy manufacturing, state-sponsored investment and exports to power growth. Aware of the limits of those growth drivers, Beijing is now seeking to foster more domestic demand and to raise productivity.Policy makers have also been seeking to rein in a big expansion in credit, which has generated concerns about asset price bubbles and possible loan defaults. Last month's cash crunch within the banking sector, for example, appeared aimed at getting lenders to adopt more prudent lending practices.The cost of the overhaul is slower growth, however, and a growing number of analysts say that China will struggle to meet its growth targets this year.China is unlikely to achieve its target for this year of 8 percent growth in trade, Liu Li-Gang, a China economist at Australia & New Zealand Banking in Hong Kong, wrote in a note. "This will not only bring about downside risk to the G.D.P. growth for this year but also place severe pressure on employment," Mr. Liu wrote, referring to gross domestic product.So far, however, Beijing appears comfortable with the economy's performance and is unlikely to revert to stimulating growth again unless the job market deteriorates sharply, Ms. Yao of Société Générale said. "They seem pretty determined right now. The key thing to watch is the labor market, but this is still looking O.K."Comments from the prime minister, Li Keqiang, at a meeting in southern China on Tuesday reinforced the view that Beijing appeared prepared to press ahead with its economic overhaul."This year, economic activity has in general stayed stable, and the main indicators are still within reasonable bounds for the annual forecasts," Mr. Li said, according to the state-run Xinhua news agency."But economic conditions have become more complex and changeable," he added. "There are both favorable and unfavorable factors, and the economy has both momentum for growth and downward pressures."China must maintain steady growth while also carrying out adjustments needed to ensure healthy development in the long-term, he said. "Macro adjustment must be both grounded in the present and take a long-term view, so that economic activity is within reasonable bounds, and the rate of economic growth and employment levels do not slip below the lower limit."
HONG KONG — China's new tough-love approach to overhauling its giant economy showed through in lackluster economic data released on Monday, underlining just how rapidly growth in the once-sizzling economy has cooled.China's economy grew 7.5 percent in the second quarter of this year, compared with the same period a year earlier, the National Bureau of Statistics reported. The figure was in line with economists' expectations, but represented a progressive slowdown from 7.7 percent gross domestic product growth in the first quarter and 7.9 percent in the final three months of 2012.Industrial output data for June, also released Monday, came in weaker than forecast, with an increase of 8.9 percent from a year earlier — down from 9.2 percent in May. The growth in fixed asset investment in urban areas, another key measure of economic activity, also slowed slightly during the first six months of the year.On the upside, however, retail sales came in better than expected, rising 13.3 percent in June from a year earlier. The May reading was 12.9 percent.The slowdown in the world's second-largest economy after the United States has left some analysts concerned that China could lose yet more steam in the coming quarters, denting the ravenous demand for goods that has been a key support to global growth at a time when Europe and the United States are struggling to grow.Xianfang Ren, an economist at IHS Global Insight in Beijing, wrote in a research note on Monday that China's growth was "at risk of stalling," and that "the downside risk for growth has become much more elevated now than a few months ago."Increasing signs that China is faltering have prompted a number of economists to downgrade their forecasts for the country. Zhang Zhiwei, China economist at Nomura, lowered his growth forecast for 2014 from 7.5 percent to 6.9 percent following Monday's data release (he continues to project 7.5 percent growth for this year).Officials in Beijing, however, continued to signal on Monday that they were comfortable with the slowdown, which comes as the country is preparing for a major structural overhaul designed to put future expansion on a more sustainable and balanced footing albeit at the price of more moderate growth.Sheng Laiyun, the spokesman for the statistics bureau, said on Monday that the latest data were within the bounds of official expectations, though he acknowledged headwinds were buffeting the economy."Viewed over all, national economic performance in the first half of the year was generally stable, and the main indicators remain within the reasonable bounds for the annual forecast," Mr. Sheng said during a news conference broadcast live on Chinese television. "But economic conditions are still complex and changeable."To a large degree, China's recent cooling has been engineered by the authorities in Beijing, who are trying to steer the economy from an increasingly outdated growth model toward expansion that is more productive and sustainable.While this slowdown has been happening for more than two years, a flood of comments from policy makers in recent months has made it increasingly clear that the new leadership that took the helm in March is serious about tolerating significantly slower growth for the foreseeable future in return for the longer-term gains of a more balanced economy.Evidence of China's cooling could prompt some limited policy shifts aimed at supporting especially pressured parts of the economy, analysts said. On Monday, for example, the governor of China's central bank, Zhou Xiaochuan, and other officials said the government would extend more support to small businesses as part of its efforts to ignite new sources of growth.Speaking at a conference about small business policy, Mr. Zhou outlined the challenges confronting policy makers."Currently, domestic and external economic conditions are unusually complicated, there are quite a number of destabilizing and uncertain factors, and the downward pressures on the economy are quite considerable," Mr. Zhou said, according to a transcript of his comments on the Chinese government's main Web site.Still, few analysts expect the government to revert to heavy-hitting stimulus measures of the kind implemented after the financial crisis.
HONG KONG — China's manufacturing sector contracted in July at the quickest pace since last summer, according to the early reading of a survey released on Wednesday.The survey came in at an 11-month low of 47.7 points for July, down from the final June figure of 48.2. A result below the 50-point level signals contraction.The monthly survey of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector, compiled by the research firm Markit and released by the British bank HSBC, offers one of the earliest glimpses at how the economy is doing each month and is closely watched by economists and investors. Final figures for July, based on more complete survey results, are scheduled to be released next week, alongside the results of an official manufacturing survey to be published the National Bureau of Statistics.The so-called flash P.M.I. data provided the latest sign of the pressures faced by China as a whole as the authorities in Beijing try to raise productivity, living standards and domestic demand while shifting the economy away from its reliance on exports and investment.The new P.M.I. data "suggests a continuous slowdown in manufacturing sectors thanks to weaker new orders and faster destocking," Qu Hongbin, the chief China economist at HSBC, said Wednesday in a statement accompanying the survey results. The July figure puts pressure on the labor market and "reinforces the need to introduce additional fine-tuning measures to stabilize growth."The efforts by President Xi Jinping and Prime Minister Li Keqiang, who took office in March, to rebalance the economy involve a delicate attempt to rein in the inefficient investments and surging lending of the past few years — but to do so without snuffing out the growth that is needed to create jobs, and maintain social and financial stability.Analysts generally agree that the newfound emphasis on the quality, rather than the sheer speed, of growth is encouraging because it could bring about some of the changes that are needed to put China's once supercharged economy on the path toward a more sustainable pace of expansion in the long term.But this process also entails the risk that growth could slow down more sharply than intended, some economists warn.Data released on July 15 showed that China's gross domestic product grew 7.5 percent in the second quarter of this year, compared with the same period a year earlier. That was a notable slowdown from previous quarters, showing that China's economy continues to cool and indicating that Beijing may struggle to meet its official growth target of 7.5 percent for the full year if the deterioration continues.
HONG KONG — A manufacturing index published by the Chinese authorities on Thursday provided an unexpectedly solid reading for July but did little to dispel the picture of an economy that is cooling more rapidly than many analysts had expected just months ago.The reading, published by the National Bureau of Statistics, edged up slightly, to 50.3 from 50.1 in June, indicating that recent small-scale economic support measures announced by the authorities in Beijing might be aiding some parts of the economy.The slight increase confounded analysts' expectations that the index would slip below the 50-point mark, which separates expansion from contraction.Underlining the lingering malaise within the Chinese economy, however, a separate manufacturing activity gauge published by the British bank HSBC came in at an 11-month low of 47.7. The figure, which was unchanged from the initial reading published last week, highlighted the tough environment that many Chinese companies still face. That goes especially for the small and privately owned companies — many of them exporters that are struggling with sluggish demand and a stronger renminbi — that are more heavily represented in the HSBC survey."With weak demand from both domestic and external markets, the cooling manufacturing sector continued to weigh on employment," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a statement accompanying the release.And economists at Australia & New Zealand Banking Group wrote in a note that the improved state index "doesn't change our overall assessment of the deteriorating economy."Many analysts caution that Beijing's efforts to stem often opaque and unregulated lending activities outside the formal banking sector — while welcome — are likely to dampen economic activity. Slowing growth, meanwhile, could undermine the ability of some borrowers to service their debt, potentially leading to defaults and bankruptcies further down the line.In a report published Thursday, for example, Standard & Poor's warned that many of the weaker players in the property sector — a key pillar of the Chinese economy, the world's second-largest after that of the United States — "could find it more difficult or costly to borrow this year if the central government takes further steps to rein in 'shadow banking' activities," which it said were a major source of funding for developers that could not secure bank loans.On the upside, Mr. Qu of HSBC noted, the string of recent weak data has prompted Beijing to introduce more targeted support measures, which he said "should boost confidence and reduce downside risks to growth."The leadership that took the helm in Beijing in March has been insisting that the slowdown is not only desirable — as part of its efforts to rein in excessive lending and bring about more balanced growth — but also stable and sufficient to meet its target of a 7.5 percent economic growth rate this year.But it has also prescribed a steady stream of small-scale, targeted support measures in a bid to ensure that growth does not cool too rapidly.Those have included tax cuts for small businesses and measures aimed at speeding up railroad construction in inland and poor areas. In a bid to raise the economy's overall efficiency, the authorities have also issued instructions to more than 1,400 companies in 19 industries to cut excess production capacity this year.Meanwhile, the central bank said July 19 that it would no longer set a minimum interest rate for corporate loans — a symbolically important first step toward wider interest-rate liberalization."All of these things amount to a small-scale stimulus," said Dariusz Kowalczyk, a senior economist and strategist at the French bank Crédit Agricole in Hong Kong. Those steps, combined with more fine-tuning moves that are likely to follow in the next few months, are likely to lift economic growth to just above the official 7.5 percent growth target this year, Mr. Kowalczyk said."The new leadership cannot afford politically to miss that target during their first year," he said, adding that he expected moves aimed at bolstering consumer demand, like subsidies for big-ticket items or consumption-tax cuts, as well as a modest depreciation in the renminbi in the coming months.Beijing's approach to supporting growth this year has been markedly different to that adopted in late 2008 and 2009. Back then, the authorities prescribed a powerful, big-bang stimulus program and loosened the reins on bank lending. Those moves helped China bounce back quickly from a sharp downturn set off by the global turmoil.But they also helped cause property prices in many Chinese cities to soar, and set off a big rise in local government and corporate debt levels — unpalatable side effects that the new leadership is now working to reverse.
HONG KONG — The Indian rupee lurched to a record low against the dollar on Tuesday, shrugging off recent measures aimed at propping it up and underscoring the severe problems facing the economy as the country heads toward an election next year.The rupee has slumped nearly 15 percent since May, when the possibility of scaled-back bond purchases in the United States prompted foreign cash to flee emerging markets around the world. The Indian central bank reacted last month with several steps to support the currency, but the rupee continued its slide Tuesday, falling to 61.71 per U.S. dollar by late afternoon.Stemming the rupee's rapid decline will be one of the first tasks for the next governor of the Reserve Bank of India, the nation's central bank. Reuters reported Tuesday that the Indian government appointed Raghuram Rajan, the chief economic adviser in the finance ministry, to the post. According to a statement by the finance minister, Mr. Rajan will replace Duvvuri Subbarao, whose tenure ends on Sept. 4 after five years, Reuters reported.Mr. Rajan joined the Indian government last August, after serving chief economist at the International Monetary Fund and a professor at the University of Chicago.India's fundamental problems, said Rajiv Biswas, Asia-Pacific chief economist at IHS Global Insight in Singapore, are a "chronic current account deficit," which has worsened over the years, and a big outflow of foreign capital since Ben S. Bernanke, the chairman of the United States Federal Reserve, signaled in May that the American economy may soon be ready to be weaned off the massive bond purchases that have bolstered its economy since the global financial crisis."Last year, they were able to deal with the current account deficit because capital inflows were strong," Mr. Biswas said. Now that the money is ebbing away, the rupee is coming under systemic pressure, he said.More broadly, much-needed economic overhauls — like improving the country's infrastructure and cutting red tape — have been notoriously tough to push through, while a slowdown in growth in recent years has made the country less attractive to foreign investors, despite the potential offered by a huge, young population.The pace of expansion has slowed to about 5.5 percent this year from more than 8 percent in 2009 and 2010, and the latest purchasing managers indexes for the manufacturing and services sectors, released by the British bank HSBC, both slipped in July."There are few good signs on the economic horizon," Mr. Biswas said, "and there is not a great deal that either the government or the central bank can do in the short term." He added that slowing growth had further reduced the government's room to maneuver.The slide in the rupee, moreover, will probably make things worse, analysts warned.Although a cheaper rupee makes Indian exports less expensive for consumers abroad, the effect provides relatively little lift to the Indian economy, as the country is far less reliant on exports than many of its Asian peers.Meanwhile, the weaker currency raises India's import bills for dollar-denominated goods like oil, of which the country is a big importer, adding pain to an already slowing economy and potentially fueling inflation to worrisome levels further down the line.
HONG KONG — The Australian central bank on Tuesday cut rates for the eighth time in less than two years in a bid to improve sluggish growth as a boom in mining investment over the past decade comes to an end.The Reserve Bank of Australia lowered its benchmark cash rate by a quarter of a percentage point to a record low of 2.5 percent, bringing the total cuts since November 2011 to 2.25 percentage points.Despite cooling growth in China, which is the main market for Australia's mineral riches, resource exports are growing, and are expected to continue to do so as projects that are now in the pipeline begin operation.Resource investments helped Australia weather the global turmoil of recent years better than other developed economies. But new investments in that sector are petering out, leaving the country struggling to rebalance with other areas, like manufacturing and tourism.A steady stream of interest rate cuts since late 2011 has helped cushion the economy so far, and data released Tuesday showed housing prices in major Australian cities rose 2.4 percent in the second quarter — more than analysts had expected.A slide in the Australian dollar could also help lift tourism. Undermined in part by a growing awareness that China is on a path to slower growth, the Australian currency has fallen about 15 percent against the U.S. dollar since mid-April.Any lift in consumer and business sentiment from this and the latest rate cut could be welcome news for the government, which faces elections next month.But unemployment has edged up as the mining boom has faded, and policy makers and analysts have warned that economic rebalancing will be challenging and take time.In a statement accompanying the rate decision Tuesday, the central bank governor, Glenn Stevens, hinted at the divergent trends, saying that although there had recently been "signs of increased demand for finance by households," the pace of borrowing had remained "relatively subdued."The latest interest rate cut had been widely expected after comments from Mr. Stevens in a speech last week about the end of the mining boom.Resource sector investment, he said, had risen from an average of about 2 percent of gross domestic product to peak around 8 percent on the back of soaring international demands."That big rise is now over, and a fall is in prospect, with uncertain timing. It could be quite a big fall in due course," Mr. Stevens said.Similarly, the government on Aug. 2 lowered its growth forecasts for the current financial year, which runs through June 2014, saying it expected expansion of 2.5 percent, rather than the 2.75 percent it had projected.The "abnormal period of heavy reliance on one part of the economy" will come to an end, and "managing the transition back to more normal, broader based growth will be a key economic challenge over the next few years," the government said in its assessment."If we don't see some improvement in the leading indicators of the economy, such as job ads and business conditions," or if the Australian dollar strengthens again, economists at UBS in Sydney wrote in a research note, the central bank "will likely have some further work to do either late this year or early 2014."
HONG KONG — China's trade rebounded in July in a possible sign that its economy is stabilizing after a slowdown over the last year.The improvement offers small but encouraging hope for China's leaders, who are struggling to arrest a downturn that dragged growth to a two-decade low in the latest quarter.China's exports rose 5.1 percent in July from a year earlier and imports were up 10.9 percent, according to customs data. China is the world's second-largest economy, after the United States.Economists had expected trade to grow after it shrank in June, but the rate of growth surpassed expectations.Economists said the surge in imports suggested that domestic demand was holding up, a major goal for China's policy makers, who are trying to reduce the economy's dependence on trade and investment in favor of more self-sustaining domestic consumption.Imports of iron ore, an important commodity used to make steel, surged 24 percent by volume, while copper imports grew 12 percent. Both figures were the fastest rates in more than a year, said Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale.She said the return to growth was a sign of "some stabilization in external demand, at best — not yet a solid recovery."Analysts said the figures were a sign of improvement but cautioned about reading too much into a single set of numbers."July seems to reflect a return to a normal, relatively uninspiring trend after a weak June, rather than the beginning of acceleration in growth," said Alistair Chan, an economist at Moody's Analytics. "While the worst seems to be over, the upturn will be relatively flat."Chinese leaders are facing pressure to meet a goal of 7.5 percent growth for the year, which is far stronger than the forecasts for the United States, Europe and Japan, but would be the country's weakest performance since 1991.Exports to the United States, China's biggest foreign market, edged up 2.3 percent, leaving a trade surplus of $19.1 billion. Exports to the 27-nation European Union shrank 2.8 percent, for a trade gap of $10 billion.
HONG KONG — China's economy faces major structural challenges in the coming years, but for now, the slowdown of the recent past may have bottomed out.A new batch of economic data released Friday provided additional signs of buoyancy in an economy that has been weighed down by lackluster international demand. The Chinese government has also taken a tough-love approach, eager to wean the country from its reliance on exports and cheap credit.Industrial output growth, which had been languishing around 9 percent for the past few months, jumped to 9.7 percent in July, the National Bureau of Statistics reported. The figure easily beat expectations for a rise of 9 percent, and helped support tentative signs that conditions in the country's manufacturing sector were starting to show a moderate improvement.Retail sales grew 13.2 percent from a year earlier, slightly less than the 13.5 percent that analysts polled by Reuters had expected, but in line with the performance of the past few months.And investment in fixed assets, like buildings and machinery, in urban areas also was in line with expectations, growing 20.1 percent in the first seven months of this year.Together with unexpectedly solid import and export data released Thursday, this week's data appeared to show that the Chinese economy has stabilized, at least for now, and prompted some analysts to project a modest pickup in the coming months.''The better-than-expected July activity data has largely dampened the concern of a hard landing of China's economy,'' economists at Australia and New Zealand Banking Group wrote in a note. It suggests that China's economy ''is bottoming out.''China had been gradually losing steam for many months as it left behind the supercharged growth that turned it into the world's second-largest economy, after the United States. Economic growth is likely to come in at about 7.5 percent this year, a far cry from the double-digit annual increases the country enjoyed for much of the past three decades.Still, the data for July appeared to indicate that some of the recent drags on growth have eased.Export demand from the West has improved as the United States and other economies have gained momentum. And domestically, the authorities in Beijing have clarified in recent weeks that while they are prepared to tolerate slower growth, they will also step in to prevent growth from slowing too rapidly.Beijing has also announced a string of small-scale measures aimed at propping up activity — tax cuts for small businesses, for example, and measures aimed at speeding up railroad construction in inland and poor areas.The improved policy clarity and support measures appear to have encouraged the increased activity, especially in the private sector, said Stephen Schwartz, chief economist for Asia at the Spanish bank BBVA in Hong Kong.The latest reports on Friday "gives us more confidence in our forecast that growth will stabilize in the third quarter, and pick up gradually in the fourth quarter," Mr. Schwartz said. However, like many other analysts, he said that the outlook for next year and beyond remained uncertain as China battles with the tough overhauls that are needed as the country tries to shift toward more efficient, balanced and sustainable growth.Economic turmoil in the West and rising wages at home have undermined the export growth that formed the bedrock of China's growth for decades. The fact that China's population is aging and its labor force is shrinking means there is an urgent need to raise labor productivity and reduce the inefficiencies and misallocations of capital that have marred growth for years. And overcapacity, corruption and poor allocation of assets continue to affect growth.Inflation figures released Friday underlined the challenges facing many industries. While consumer price inflation remained muted in July, at 2.7 percent, the price of goods as they leave the factory gate fell 2.3 percent from a year ago, continuing a decline that has lasted for more than a year.Beijing has sought to rein in credit in a bid to tackle the flow of easy money that fueled growth in recent years, but that has generated worries about asset quality and potentially destabilizing defaults further down the line.These challenges will weigh on China for years, prompting some analysts to warn — despite the apparent stabilization in July — that growth will slow to well below the current official target of 7.5 percent.''While we believe the government could delay sub-7 percent growth into 2014, we do not believe it can be avoided,'' Zhang Zhiwei, China economist at Nomura, wrote in a note, adding that he believed the government was likely to cut its growth target for next year to 7 percent.''Leverage in the economy remains high, and many industries continue to face overcapacity problems,'' Mr. Zhang said. ''The resolution of these problems will inevitably require a period of constructive destruction — expect some bankruptcy cases.''
HONG KONG — The beleaguered Indian rupee continued its steep descent on Wednesday, hitting a record low of 64.54 to the dollar amid global nervousness about the timing and scale of the Federal Reserve's likely scaling back of its bond-buying program.The 2 percent drop took the Indian currency's decline since early May to 20 percent, raising worries about the impact it will have on the country's substantial import bills and on an already large current account deficit.Indian stocks also dropped. The Sensex index closed down 1.9 percent and the Nifty ended 1.8 percent lower. Both indexes have dropped more than 10 percent since late July.Signs that the American central bank will reduce its bond purchases soon set off big outflows of cash from emerging markets around the world in May, and the reverberations continued Wednesday. A drop in the Indonesian currency sent the rupiah to 10,755 per dollar, its lowest level since April 2009. The South African rand and Brazilian real likewise are now at their weakest level since early 2009. Indonesia also has a large current account deficit.In India, however, the rupee's latest decline comes on top of a slide that began in 2011, when mounting signs of reform gridlock began to cast a serious pall over the once-rosy India story. In total, the rupee has now sagged more than 40 percent since mid-2011, and many analysts warn that it could fall even further.The Indian government, scrambling to halt the slide, have in recent weeks rushed out measures like higher import duties on gold and silver and restrictions on the amount that local companies can invest overseas without seeking approval. The Reserve Bank of India also appeared to have intervened in the currency markets on Wednesday to stem the rupee's fall, Reuters reported, citing traders.So far, however, these efforts have not succeeded in restoring investor confidence, which had already been undermined by slowing growth and by the prospect that elections next year may handicap efforts to push through much-needed structural reforms."Rupee sentiment is very fragile," Brian Jackson, global currency strategist at Coutts, wrote in a research note. It is hard to see the central bank "being able to control the rupee's fall without further impeding growth, either by pushing up bond yields or making it more difficult to access bank financing," he added.Kim Eng Tan, senior director of Asia-Pacific sovereign ratings at Standard & Poor's, said in an e-mailed statement that recent government measures to restrict capital outflows had increased uncertainty among foreign and domestic investors.If this continues, he said, "business financing conditions could deteriorate further and investment growth could slow further. India's long-term growth prospects could weaken on a sustained basis, with negative implications for the sovereign credit fundamentals. It is, however, too early now to tell if this scenario will come to pass. This will be largely dependent on policy makers' reactions to these latest developments. We maintain a negative outlook on India's BBB- sovereign credit ratings."
HONG KONG — An early reading Thursday of a closely watched survey of manufacturing-sector activity provided the latest indication that China's economy had bottomed out after many months of slowing growth.The preliminary purchasing managers' index for August, compiled by the research firm Markit and released by the British bank HSBC, jumped to 50.1 points from 47.7 in July, showing a swing to expansion from contraction, with a figure of 50 the dividing line. The increase, to a four-month high, easily beat analysts' expectations.HSBC's preliminary survey offers one of the earliest indications each month of how the Chinese economy is doing, and Thursday's reading is likely to solidify expectations that a stabilization that had begun to show in July has continued into August.The reading "adds to the number of green shoots indicating a stabilizing economy since July," Li Wei and Stephen Green, economists at Standard Chartered, wrote in a note, adding that government-led measures aimed at shoring up economic growth, like tax breaks for small businesses and steps aimed at speeding up railway construction, appeared to have begun to take effect.Future purchasing manager surveys, they said, were likely to "continue to hover between 50 and 53 in the coming months, with no dramatic improvement."The Chinese authorities' approach of economy-bolstering tweaks focused on specific areas contrasts with the big-bang stimulus adopted after the global financial crisis and highlights Beijing's willingness to accept slower growth as it tries to reduce the economy's reliance on cheap credit, investments and exports.After years of double-digit expansion rates, the economy has now settled into a slower pace of growth of around 7.5 percent this year. And despite the unexpectedly strong survey results on Thursday, some analysts said the picture could well cloud again next year.Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale Hong Kong, said government-driven infrastructure investment should be able in the short term to offset problems like the renminbi's strength relative to many other emerging Asian currencies, many of which have fallen sharply in recent months. A rebound in the third quarter is "almost certain," Ms. Yao said.However, she added, a similar pickup during the fourth quarter of last year, which was also aided by government policy, was short-lived. Given efforts to rein in shadow banking activities and potential challenges from abroad as the Federal Reserve scales back its support of the U.S. economy, "we caution that this uptick may not last either," she said.
BEIJING — China's factory activity expanded at the fastest pace in more than a year in August with a jump in new orders, official data showed on Sunday, raising hopes that a rapid economic slowdown in the world's second-largest economy may have been arrested.The purchasing managers' index figure, published by the National Bureau of Statistics, rose to 51.0 in August from 50.3 in July, the highest level since last April and above market expectations of 50.6 in a Reuters poll.A reading above 50 indicates expanding activity, while a reading below 50 points to a contraction.Beijing has stepped up efforts to prevent a sharp economic slowdown by quickening railroad investment and public housing construction and introducing measures to help smaller companies, which could sustain the revival of internal demand in the coming months."We are seeing clearer signs of economic conditions improving," said Haibin Zhu, chief China economist at JPMorgan in Hong Kong. "One of the reasons is the lagging effect of credit growth earlier in the year, while the second is the recent shift in the policy stance and more concrete policy announcement."As one of the first leading indicators gauging economic momentum, the improved reading could bode well for other August data, further confirming a stabilizing trend in the economy.The official survey showed an across-the-board recovery in all subindices, including new orders, quantity of purchases, input prices and employment, pointing to a positive picture for the vast factory sector."The P.M.I. figure showed evident recovery in August, suggesting the economy is further stabilizing," Zhang Liqun, an economist at the Development Research Center, a top government research organization in Beijing, said in a statement accompanying the P.M.I."The improvement in all subindices also showed market expectations are turning better and companies are adapting to the changing business environment," he added.The subindex measuring new orders rose to 52.4 in August from 50.6 in July, indicating stronger demand for Chinese goods. Export orders returned to expansionary territory, rising to 50.2 from 49.0 in July, suggesting external demand is also up.A separate P.M.I. survey sponsored by HSBC, which focuses more on small- and medium-size firms in the private sector, is scheduled to be published on Monday.Its preliminary August reading, published last week, rose to 50.1, the highest level in four months, mainly because of a rebound in new orders. Together with the official data Sunday and their focus on larger state-owned firms, the two surveys should show a broad-based stabilization in manufacturing.Chinese officials have been optimistic about the growth outlook, saying there are clear signs of stabilization emerging from the economy and that the annual gross domestic product target of 7.5 percent is achievable. Vice Finance Minister Zhu Guangyao said Tuesday there was no need for government stimulus and that growth could instead be supported through structural adjustments.The Commerce Ministry has also said China's trade flows steadied in early August, with global demand improving and measures to help exporters kicking in.Mr. Zhu said the thrust of Beijing's recent measures was to stabilize the economy to create a platform for reform.He said the government has been talking about specific policy measures, like railroad investment, which has given some clarity.Despite an uptick in manufacturing activity, analysts caution that a strong rebound appears unlikely because most Chinese companies still face relatively high financing costs, in part because of Beijing's campaign to curb shadow banking. An uncertain export environment and a strong renminbi are also risk factors.China's economy has slowed for nine out of the past 10 quarters, with G.D.P. growth dipping to 7.5 percent in the second quarter from 7.7 percent in the previous three months.Beijing has said it is willing to tolerate slower growth as it pushes reforms designed to abandon an economic model that relies on debt-financed construction and exports in favor of one driven by domestic consumption.
BEIJING — China's factory activity expanded for the first time in four months in August as domestic demand rebounded, a private survey showed Monday, a further sign that policymakers may have averted a sharp slowdown in the world's second-largest economy.The final HSBC/Markit Purchasing Managers' Index climbed to 50.1 in August, up sharply from 47.7 in July and in line with the flash reading last week. The survey came a day after a more optimistic official manufacturing P.M.I., which showed factory activity expanding at the fastest pace in more than a year in August, with a jump in new orders.The official P.M.I., which came in at 51 versus expectations for 50.6, is more weighted toward bigger and state-owned firms, which have easier access to credit and the scale to better cope with downturns.But a P.M.I. reading above 50 indicates growth while one below 50 demarcates contraction, so the latest data suggest the expansion in August was only modest.Indeed, the survey showed new export orders dipping from July, staying well below the 50-point threshold. New orders, which include domestic orders, showed marginal growth by rising to 50.8, a four-month high."We expect some upside surprises to China's growth in the coming months," said Qu Hongbin, an HSBC economist, noting that factory activity had picked up as companies rebuilt their stocks amid recent steps taken by the Chinese authorities to boost activity.
HONG KONG — China's trade surplus rose in August to its highest level this year, while inflation remained under control, government data released on Sunday and Monday showed, in further signs that the Chinese economy and possibly the global economy are faring a little better as the summer ends.The General Administration of Customs in Beijing said on Sunday that China's surplus reached $28.52 billion last month, the highest level since last December, as exports accelerated. Because China is the world's largest exporter and often the first large country to release trade data each month, its trade figures are a widely watched barometer not only for the health of China's large export sector but also of the global economy.Two other worries about China — inflation at the consumer level that might fan public discontent or deflation at the producer level that might prompt companies to stop investing — seemed to be allayed at least temporarily as well by Monday morning's data.The National Bureau of Statistics announced that consumer prices were only up 2.6 percent in August from a year earlier, compared to a 2.7 percent increase in July. At the same time, deflation slowed in producer prices, which fell only 1.6 percent in August after tumbling 2.3 percent in July.The Chinese trade and inflation data, and recent surveys showing more bullish sentiment among purchasing managers in China, are starting to give hope to those who argue that the gloom these days about Asian economies, particularly China's, is excessive."China is no longer sliding, the global industrial cycle is ticking up, and, really, how high can rates go with the Fed printing money?" asked Frederic Neumann, the co-head of Asian economic research at HSBC.To be sure, China still faces high and rising levels of domestic debt, eroding competitiveness because of surging wages and other challenges.But China's exports last month were up 7.1 percent last month compared to a year earlier, and particularly strong to Southeast Asia, South Korea and Taiwan. China's trade surplus also increased because imports were virtually unchanged for the huge category of reprocessing goods — items as varied as high-end plastics and computer chips that are imported by China for use in products that are then exported.The flattening in imports of reprocessing goods reflects a broad move by many multinational companies to shift entire supply chains to mainland China, instead of merely assembling goods there from components manufactured all over the world. That trend toward procuring parts in China persists even as a growing number of export factories in low-wage sectors like garments, toys and furniture are moving to other countries, like Bangladesh, Cambodia and Vietnam.Excluding reprocessing goods, China's other imports grew strongly in August as lending increased at state-controlled banks. Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, said the import data could indicate "continued robust growth in demand and economic activity in China's own economy."But he cautioned that detailed information on domestic economic activity in China during August, including industrial production, investment in fixed assets and retail sales, was not scheduled for release until Tuesday morning in Beijing.The trade and inflation data were the latest signs that China has emerged largely unscathed from currency declines and market setbacks seen in many emerging markets this summer.As money poured in from around the world to buy Chinese goods, China's central bank allowed the renminbi to inch up 0.1 percent against the dollar last month."The market turbulence in emerging economies, especially in India and Indonesia, has made Rmb a center of stability," Liu Li-Gang, the chief economist for greater China at the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group, said in a research note, using a common abbreviation for the Chinese currency.While the renminbi's gain last month was tiny, it contrasted with declines among most emerging market currencies, as investors fretted that policy makers at the American central bank will decide at a meeting on Sept. 18 to begin slowing the pace of a program of asset purchases. That could cause interest rates in the United States to climb further, making investments there more attractive, and reducing the appeal of emerging markets.
HONG KONG — A China manufacturing index hit its highest level in six months on Monday, offering the first important measure of how the country's economy performed in September and showing that a tentative reacceleration has continued as government support and firmer demand for Chinese exports have gained traction.HSBC's manufacturing purchasing managers index — a survey that takes the temperature of China's important factory sector — rose to 51.2 in September, from 50.1, topping analysts' expectations. The index HSBC released on Monday was based on a preliminary assessment of survey responses. A final reading will be published on Sept. 30. A separate index compiled by the authorities in Beijing, more focused on larger, state-owned enterprises of the kind that benefit from state-led investment, will be released on Oct. 1.Readings above 50 indicate expansion, so the September figure provided more evidence that the Chinese manufacturing sector was growing again after several months of contraction, while the economy as a whole had stopped decelerating.The firmer reading "was supported by simultaneous improvements of external and domestic demand conditions," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a note accompanying the data release.Faced with slowing growth, the authorities in Beijing have in recent months announced a series of measures aimed at increasing economic activity.Although China has avoided a repeat of the sweeping, large-scale stimulus of late 2008 and 2009, the smaller-scale, more targeted support measures of the last year or so have helped to put a floor under the economy, analysts have said.Measures announced this year have included tax cuts for small businesses and measures aimed at speeding up railroad construction in inland and poor areas. In a bid to raise the economy's efficiency, the authorities have also issued instructions to more than 1,400 companies in 19 industries to cut excess production capacity this year."We expect a more sustained recovery as the further filtering-through of fine-tuning measures should lift domestic demand. This will create more favorable conditions to push forward reforms, which should in turn boost mid- and long-term growth outlooks," Mr. Qu wrote.Improving demand in the beleaguered United States and European economies also is helping activity in China. New orders for exports picked up speed in September, the HSBC poll showed, echoing a trend seen in trade data for August, released this month."Looking ahead, we expect the cyclical pickup to be consolidated in the coming quarters, benefiting from the strengthening global demand outlook, which supports growth directly via stronger exports and by improving sentiment and profitability in industry and thus the willingness to invest," wrote Louis Kuijs, a China economist at RBS in Hong Kong.The latest signs of China's resilience on Monday helped push Chinese stocks higher; the Shanghai composite rose 1.33 percent.Still, many analysts continued to caution that the upturn may not last into next year, given that the leadership in Beijing will have to step up its efforts to combat issues — like overcapacity in some major industries, often poor allocation of capital, and a buildup in debt over the last few years — that haunt China's economy."The third plenary session of the Central Committee, which is to be held this November, will lay out the agenda of economic reform going ahead," said Zhu Haibin, chief China economist at JPMorgan Chase. "Addressing these problems in the coming years implies that the economic recovery tends to be limited."
HONG KONG — In a move that underscores the growing importance of Asia as a market for goods as varied as fast cars, fine wines and postage stamps, Spink & Sons, a small auction house founded in London in 1666, announced on Tuesday that its chief executive had relocated to Hong Kong.Olivier D. Stocker, a former investment banker who spent many years in Asia before buying the auction house in 2002, moved to Hong Kong from London this month, a step he said was aimed at galvanizing Asian growth."If you really want to focus your mind and business on the region, you have to live here," said Mr. Stocker, who is French. By basing himself and his family full time in Hong Kong, he said, "you are sending an important message to your customers and your staff that you believe in the region, that you are committed to it."Mr. Stocker's remarks echo those of a growing number of senior executives from non-Asian companies who have based themselves in cities like Singapore, Hong Kong and Shanghai, rather than in the countries in which their companies have headquarters.The phenomenon is fairly recent, but has picked up rapidly in the past few years as Asia's appetite for industrial, consumer and luxury goods has emerged as a key engine of growth for Western companies struggling at home.In 2008, for example, just 19.1 percent of non-Asian multinational companies surveyed by the Economist Corporate Network had one or more board members living and working in Asia. By last year, that figure had reached 38.3 percent. What is more, 52.6 percent of the respondents in the Economist Corporate Network's 2012 survey expected to have board members in the region by 2017.Among those who have chosen to base themselves in Asia in recent years are John Rice, vice chairman of General Electric and president and chief executive of global growth and operations, who moved to Hong Kong in 2011; Jean-Pascal Tricoirse, the chief executive of Schneider Electric, a French engineering company that derives more than a quarter of its sales from Asia, spends so much time traveling in Asia that his family has moved to Hong Kong.The auction world, too, has seen Asian spending power become a key driver of growth over the past decade as affluence has increased throughout the region, industry experts say.Hong Kong, for example, has emerged as a key venue for high-end jewelry auctions in the past six or seven years and now ranks alongside Geneva and New York as a center for such sales.Likewise, Mr. Stocker said, Hong Kong has long been an important market for the stamps, coins and other collectibles that his auction house specializes in."But you have really seen Asian buyers picking up steam and momentum over the past decade," he said. "The region is the fastest growing in the world."Asian buyers now account for about one-third of the money spent at Spinks sales, which take place in London, Hong Kong, Singapore, New York and elsewhere. That proportion, he said, could rise to about 50 percent in the next five or 10 years.
HONG KONG — A report by Nomura said Thursday that Chinese municipal debt, a focal point of major concern about the country's economy, had grown at an alarming 39 percent clip in recent years.The report by Nomura estimated that the financing vehicles used by local governments to raise cash had created debts totaling at least 19 trillion renminbi, or $3.1 trillion, by the end of last year and posed a "major risk to the economy.""Liquidity risks are rising," said Zhang Zhiwei, chief China economist at Nomura and one of the authors of the report. He added that the bank's research — based on a survey of 869 of these local government financing vehicles, entities set up to borrow in various ways on behalf of the cities — showed that more than half of the debt would have been at risk of default last year had local governments not supported it.The number in Nomura's report roughly matches a recent estimate by Liu Yuhui, an economist in the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, a government research organization in Beijing."I personally feel that the scale of local debt has already broken beyond 20 trillion yuan," Mr. Liu told a forum in Beijing in mid-September, according to Caixin, a Chinese business magazine. Yuan is another name for China's currency, the renminbi. "You can say there is a risk of local government debt getting out of control."Bank lending and local government debt have soared in recent years, and were a major driver of China's economic rebound after the global financial crisis. As land sales, a traditional way to raise funds, have slowed, local governments have increasingly resorted to bank loans, bonds or equity market offerings to generate cash for the infrastructure projects that have been propelling growth.The huge increase in this activity, however, has caused analysts and policy makers to worry about the financial risks accompanying it, and the new leadership in Beijing has made it clear that it wants to rein in those dangers.In one of the clearest signs to date that they are trying to get a handle on the situation, the authorities in Beijing in July ordered an audit of local government debt. China watchers expect the results to be published in the coming weeks, probably before a plenary session of the Communist Party Central Committee in November, at which more details of China's broad economic overhaul are likely to be communicated.Beijing's eagerness to combat financial risks and bring about more efficient and disciplined allocation of capital will mean slower growth and possibly isolated loan defaults in the coming years, analysts like Mr. Zhang say. But such discipline is also seen as a crucial element of China's long-term economic development, according to the International Monetary Fund."Macro conditions will deteriorate if the current pace of local government debt buildup continues," Mr. Zhang said. "The efficacy of this debt-driven investment strategy will dwindle as funds raised are increasingly used to service existing debt over new investment."He added that the government not only retained ample financial firepower to prop up ailing borrowers and contain a systemic crisis in the next couple of years, but also appeared prepared to tolerate the slower growth that reduced lending would entail."We expect some individual L.G.F.V. defaults in 2014, but a systemic default in L.G.F.V. debt in the short term is unlikely, as the fiscal cost to roll over debt is still low," he wrote, referring to local government financing vehicles. "In other words, the government is still capable of putting L.G.F.V. debt back on a sustainable path, but if it chooses to delay a resolution, the risks — and fiscal cost — may be very high down the road."
HONG KONG — The Asian Development Bank lowered its growth forecasts for emerging nations in the region on Wednesday and called for more structural changes to support the local economies.In its twice-yearly economic overview of developing Asia — which includes India, China, the Philippines and Vietnam, but not Japan — the bank said it now expected the region to grow 6 percent this year and 6.2 percent in 2014.Those numbers were down from the 6.6 percent and 6.7 percent, respectively, that the development bank had projected in its previous outlook report, in April. Last year, the region expanded 6.1 percent.Much of Asia enjoyed a sharp rebound in the years immediately after the global financial crisis, buoyed by an aggressive stimulus program in China and the cash that flowed in as investors and businesses looked for higher returns than those available in the languishing United States and European economies.Those drivers have faded since last year. China's economy has cooled as policy makers in Beijing have sought to put growth on a stable footing. And the prospect of reduced monetary stimulus in the United States, whose economy is perking up, has prompted a big exodus of Western cash from emerging markets in Asia and elsewhere in recent months."Developing Asia is challenged to sustain its growth momentum as the pace in its two largest economies moderates," the Asian Development Bank said, referring to China and India. The "prospective tapering of quantitative easing in the United States destabilized emerging economy financial markets, including in developing Asia."At the same time, the bank said, the upturn in the U.S. economy and signs that the euro zone and Japan are turning the corner have "yet to translate into revived orders for exports from developing Asia."India — where poor infrastructure, crippling bureaucracy and policy squabbles have long presented huge hurdles to doing business — has been especially hard hit by the souring investor sentiment toward emerging markets. A sharp drop in the rupee since May has worsened some of the challenges facing the economy, many analysts have warned, and the biggest downward revision the Asian Development Bank made in its update on Wednesday was to the India forecast. The bank now expects the Indian economy to grow 4.7 percent this year, down from its previous estimate of 6 percent. For 2014, India is forecast grow 5.7 percent, down from 6.5 percent.For China, the bank lowered its forecasts to 7.6 percent growth this year and 7.4 percent next year, from 8.2 percent and 8 percent.But unlike in India, China's slowdown, from an average of 10.5 percent growth a year over the past decade, is a "healthy" and "intentional" adjustment as the authorities work to rebalance the economy, Changyong Rhee, chief economist at the bank, said in a news conference in Hong Kong. He added that he expected growth in China to average about 7 percent over the next decade.He stressed that, despite the murkier outlook, Asia remained in a stronger position than during the 1997 financial crisis, thanks to larger reserves of foreign exchange and the current-account surpluses that many countries now run. Slower growth in China and India, he said, hampers but does not hobble growth across Asia.Still, the Asian Development Bank's report said, echoing the remarks of other analysts, the recent financial turmoil has demonstrated the need for structural overhauls to support growth."As Asia transitions toward a more sustainable growth path, governments must watch out for volatile capital flows and financial market disruption," the bank said. "They must also continue to pursue sound macroeconomic policies that include building up fiscal space during good times. Priority areas include foreign direct investment, industrial diversification, infrastructure and human capital, fiscal consolidation, and social protection."The impact of the U.S. government shutdown, meanwhile, is likely to be limited beyond the United States, whose economic recovery is led by the private rather than the public sector, Mr. Rhee said.By far the bigger worry, he said, is the debt ceiling deadline this month. If Congress cannot agree to raise the government's borrowing limit, the government on Oct. 17 would technically default. This could severely undermine global investor confidence in U.S. Treasury bonds and generate major market volatility and outflows from Asia, Mr. Rhee said. He added that he believed policy makers would work to avoid such an outcome.
HONG KONG — India's trade deficit dropped to its lowest level since early 2011, data released Wednesday showed, providing a rare piece of good news from an economy that has been weighed down by inadequate infrastructure, a gaping current account deficit and a currency that has plummeted in recent months.India's trade deficit contracted to $6.7 billion in September, from $10.9 billion in August, the Ministry of Commerce and Industry said, as exports jumped 11.2 percent from a year earlier. The export number represented the third consecutive month of double-digit expansion, as demand from overseas was buoyed by a weaker rupee, which has helped make Indian goods cheaper for purchasers outside the country.At the same time, imports plummeted 18.1 percent as a string of government measures aimed at curbing demand for imports like gold took effect."The government has taken conscious steps to curtail imports of nonessential commodities, essentially precious metals. That is working out as the government intended," India's top trade civil servant, S.R. Rao, told Reuters.Heavily dependent on imports of oil, gold and other items, the Indian economy has long run a trade deficit — a phenomenon it was able to support as long as foreign investors, lured by years of growth and the market potential of 1.2 billion consumers, poured into the country.But the picture has changed dramatically in recent years. Investors have grown increasingly frustrated with the government's inability to tackle age-old problems such as creaking infrastructure and stifling red tape. Decision-making has been complicated further by elections scheduled for next year. And growth has dropped from more than 9 percent in 2010 to less than 5 percent this year.This, combined with a widespread exodus of foreign cash from emerging markets around the world, has dragged down the rupee sharply in recent months, prompting several government steps to prop up the currency and avert a wider crisis.The measures, and a degree of confidence instilled by the new governor of the Indian central bank, who took office last month, have helped stabilize the rupee in recent weeks.On Wednesday, the rupee was trading at 61.83 per U.S. dollar — much firmer than at its low point of nearly 69 per dollar, reached in late August. But it remains far weaker than a year ago, for example, when $1 bought only 53 rupees.Although this has helped exports, analysts cautioned on Thursday that the trade deficit could widen again in coming months as demand for gold picks up in advance of a key festival season, which begins this month."The September data has come as a big positive surprise. However, we do not expect such a trend to continue, given that seasonally the ongoing quarter tends to witness a higher trade deficit," Upasna Bhardwaj, an economist at ING Vysya Bank in Mumbai, told Reuters.Also reflecting the drag on India's economy, the Asian Development Bank last week slashed its growth forecast for the country to 4.7 percent for this year, from the 6 percent it had forecast in April, before the sell-off in emerging markets sent the rupee skidding lower. For next year, the ADB now forecasts growth of 5.7 percent, rather than the 6.5 percent it had projected in April.
BEIJING — China's annual consumer inflation rate rose to a seven-month high of 3.1 percent in September, as poor weather drove up food prices, limiting room for the central bank to maneuver to support the economy, and exports unexpectedly declined.But few analysts expect a further sharp rise in inflation or policy tightening in coming months as China faces a weak global environment and Beijing tries to reduce credit-fueled investment.The inflation rate was higher than a median forecast of 2.9 percent in a Reuters poll and the 2.6 percent rate posted in August, but it was still below the official target of 3.5 percent for 2013.Zhiwei Zhang, China economist in Hong Kong for Nomura, said that he expected inflation to rise further in the fourth quarter and saw "rising risks that it may rise above 3.5 percent for some months in 2014." The rise of inflation, however, leaves little room for policy easing, he said, because benchmark interest rates are already low. At the same time, analysts see little risk of a credit-tightening effort, given that inflation was below the full-year target.Month-on-month, consumer prices rose 0.8 percent, the National Bureau of Statistics said. Food prices increased 1.5 percent in September from August as a result of droughts and floods in some areas, pushing consumer inflation up 0.51 percentage point, Yu Qiumei, a senior statistician at the bureau, said in a statement. In annual terms, food prices jumped 6.1 percent.Li Huiyong, an economist at Shenyin & Wanguo Securities in Shanghai, said he thought inflation was still under control and would not be a concern this year, "especially when the economy is struggling with overcapacity problems."China's exports dropped 0.3 percent in September from the level of a year earlier, against expectations of a 6 percent rise, data showed on Saturday.Deflation in prices of goods leaving the factory gate eased further in September, although in annual terms prices still recorded a 19th consecutive fall. Producer prices fell 1.3 percent from a year earlier, a smaller fall than the 1.4 percent expected by the market and the 1.6 percent drop in August.There was some relief, however, for manufacturers struggling to cope with profit-eating price declines, as producer prices rose 0.2 percent from August.After slowing in nine of the past 10 quarters, the economy looks to have stabilized since midyear after Beijing acted to head off a sharper downturn with increased spending on public housing construction, railroads and tax cuts for smaller firms.Annual economic growth is forecast to have accelerated to 7.8 percent in the third quarter from 7.5 percent in the second quarter, but the recovery could fizzle toward the end of the year, the Reuters poll showed.Third-quarter figures on the gross domestic product, along with industrial output, fixed-asset investment and retail sales, is due on Friday.Beijing has a growth target of 7.5 percent for 2013, which would be the weakest rate in more than 20 years, and has repeatedly said it would accept slower growth as it tries to wean the economy from dependence on investment and exports in favor of domestic consumption."The economy faces some downward pressures, especially by looking at the export data," said Zhou Hao, China economist in Shanghai for ANZ Bank. "Full-year G.D.P. growth could be 7.6 percent."
GUANGZHOU, China — With nearly as much floor space as five McCormick Places in Chicago, the sprawling Canton Fair, which opened in Guangzhou Tuesday morning, is a monument to China's industrial versatility and export prowess.But although the 12 million square feet of exhibits still offer products as varied as wheelbarrows and Segway knockoffs, the autumn session of the fair hints at the broader malaise now afflicting exporters across China and other East Asian nations.For the first time in recent record-keeping, the number of companies with exhibits has declined in both the spring and autumn sessions of the 56-year-old Canton Fair compared with a year earlier. Even during the global financial crisis in 2009, the number of exhibitors dropped in the spring but rebounded in the autumn.Buyers from all over the world still milled through the cavernous exhibition halls on Tuesday, but they appeared less numerous than during previous fairs."It's slower than this time last year — today is opening day, and there are not many people here," said Ding Jiajun, the general manager of the Laizhou Toptool and Machinery Company, a 50-employee manufacturer of wrenches and vises in Yantian, in the eastern province of Shandong.China announced on Saturday that its exports dropped 0.25 percent in September in dollar terms compared with a year ago, below economists' expectations of 6 percent growth and far below the double-digit growth that China enjoyed for most of the last decade. In terms of the Chinese renminbi, which is what counts for Chinese exporters and overall Chinese economic output, exports fell a startling 3.6 percent last month.Nor is China alone in its difficulties. South Korea and Taiwan have already announced their export figures for September and fared even worse. South Korea fell 1.5 percent and Taiwan 7 percent in dollar terms from a year ago; Japan has not yet released its figures but has also been struggling, although recent weakness in the yen may have helped its exports."Exports are what powered Asia to prosperity," Frederic Neumann, the co-head of Asian economic research at HSBC, wrote in a research note on Tuesday. "But the engine is showing signs of serious defects."The export environment for Asian exporters may grow worse before it gets better. A growing concern for Asian exporters lies in what effect the fiscal crisis in Washington might have on the American economy, and therefore on demand for Asian goods."I am worried about what is going on in the United States right now with the looming debt crisis," said Li Shenggao, the sales manager at the Cangnan Keegao Arts and Crafts Factory, a manufacturer of gift bags and labels based in Wenzhou, China. "If no solution is found, sooner or later the U.S. economy will slow down, which will weaken the U.S. dollar and in turn reduce the competitiveness of our products."The American difficulties occur just as a combination of strengthening currencies and spiraling costs is eroding the competitiveness of Asian manufacturers, particularly in China, the world's largest exporter.The slow but steady rise of China's renminbi against the dollar, at about 3 percent a year, is another concern among Chinese exporters. Mr. Li said his costs for plastic and other raw materials were also rising 5 to 10 percent a year, while a shortage of blue-collar labor was driving up workers' wages 15 percent a year."Skilled workers with some technological know-how are still hard to come by," Mr. Li said.Mr. Ding at Laizhou Toptool, who sat in a booth with walls covered with tools in a rainbow of hues, said the cost of steel for his products had finally dipped this year. But wages in his area are climbing more than 20 percent a year as more young people go to college instead of factories, and prefer white-collar jobs when they graduate.Nicholas Kwan, the research director at the Hong Kong Trade Development Council, an advisory group created by the Hong Kong government that works closely with local chambers of commerce, said the Pearl River Delta region around Hong Kong and Guangzhou would continue to lose low-end manufacturers like garment producers to even lower-wage places like Bangladesh. But he predicted they would retain higher value-added manufacturers, like those in the electronics sector.
HONG KONG — China's economy expanded by 7.8 percent in the third quarter, compared with a year earlier, the government said on Friday, indicating a firming of economic activity after slower growth in the first part of the year.The Chinese government has set an economic growth target for 2013 of 7.5 percent. China's leaders have said that the double-digit growth of the past must be abandoned to make urgently needed adjustments to the economy. A Communist Party leadership conference next month is likely to unveil broad plans for economic change.But tepid data in the first half of the year had left some observers wondering whether even that lower target might be missed. China's economy grew by 7.5 percent in the second quarter, compared with a year earlier, and 7.7 percent in the first quarter. The latest figures announced by the National Bureau of Statistics showed that the economy grew by 7.7 percent in the first nine months of 2013."Economic activity has been relatively stable, with the main indicators within bounds of forecast targets," Sheng Laiyun, a spokesman for the bureau, told a news conference in Beijing that was broadcast on Chinese television. "Indicators for investment, consumption and exports all showed some uptick."Louis Kuijs, chief China economist for the Royal Bank of Scotland, said in a research note that the latest data reflected a recovery in China's industrial growth that started in July, as well as renewed expansion of investment in infrastructure and manufacturing."We expect G.D.P. growth to be above the government's bottom line in 2014, thus alleviating pressures to stimulate the economy," said Mr. Kuijs.He said China was likely to achieve G.D.P. growth of 7.7 percent for 2013 as a whole.China's Communist Party is trying to achieve a delicate balance. The government wants to keep economic growth robust enough to stave off risks of widespread unemployment and stagnating income growth. But leaders have also said they want to temper growth so they can enact changes, like weaning the economy off inefficient and heavily polluting industries and cutting excess production capacity.Last week, the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, said he was confident that his government had struck the right balance."China's economy is basically doing well," Mr. Xi told business leaders during a meeting in Indonesia, The People's Daily reported. "Economic growth and other major indicators are all staying within the range of forecast targets," he said.He added: "The slowdown in the pace of China's economic growth was the outcome of our own adjustment initiative."Next month, Mr. Xi will preside over a meeting of the Communist Party Central Committee that he and other senior officials have said will flesh out plans for economic changes.Chinese policy advisers and newspapers have indicated those could include some financial liberalization and adjustments in land policy to make it easier for farmers to lease out land.
HONG KONG — China's economy steadied in the third quarter, expanding by 7.8 percent compared with a year earlier, the government said Friday, indicating that the economy has pulled out of a jittery period of slowed growth thanks to revived investment, consumer spending and factory production.Economists disagree over how robust that economic uptick is, with some arguing that a boost provided by a rise in bank credit could soon fade. But the third-quarter data are likely to give policy makers in Beijing more confidence that, for now, they can maintain adequate growth without resorting to major stimulus initiatives, several economists said."We're seeing this recovery in consumer confidence," said Stephen Green, head of Greater China research for Standard Chartered, and based in Hong Kong. "We're seeing continued grinding out of the housing market recovery. So we're relatively happy that we've got at least another couple of quarters of fairly plain sailing. Credit growth has decelerated a little bit, but not enough, we think, to slow us down now."The Chinese government has set an economic growth target of 7.5 percent for 2013. China's leaders have said that the double-digit growth of the past must be abandoned so that resources and revenues can be directed toward urgently needed adjustments to the economy. A Communist Party leadership conference next month is likely to unveil broad plans for economic change.But tepid economic indicators in the first half of the year had left some observers wondering whether even that lower target might be missed without aggressive policy moves. China's economy grew by 7.5 percent in the second quarter, compared with a year earlier, and 7.7 percent in the first quarter.The latest figures from the National Bureau of Statistics showed that the economy grew by 7.7 percent in the first nine months of 2013. A spokesman for the bureau said they showed the economy is on the right footing."Economic activity has been relatively stable, with the main indicators within bounds of forecast targets," Sheng Laiyun, the spokesman, told a news conference in Beijing that was broadcast on Chinese television. "Indicators for investment, consumption and exports all showed some uptick."Mr. Sheng and other officials have said that China's economy is already benefiting from adjustments taken by the government that was installed in March. But growth still relies heavily on a long-established recipe of infrastructure investment and building projects. Investment contributed over half of the growth in the third quarter, Mr. Sheng said."If anything, some of that growth we had in the third quarter was on the domestic side coming from support from policy stimulus," said Louis Kuijs, chief China economist for the Royal Bank of Scotland. China's fixed asset investment in the third quarter grew by 20.3 percent, compared to a year before. In the second quarter, fixed asset investment grew by 19.7 percent."It was good old-fashioned policy stimulus, with credit leading to more investment," said Mr. Kuijs. China was likely to achieve G.D.P. growth of 7.7 percent for 2013 as a whole, he said. "I think we can look forward to steady growth, not like a very sharp recovery, but enough compared to their bottom line."China's Communist Party is trying to achieve a tricky balance. The government wants to keep economic growth robust enough to stave off risks of widespread unemployment and stagnating income growth. But leaders have also said they want to temper growth so they can enact changes, like weaning the economy off inefficient and heavily polluting industries and cutting excess production capacity.China's leaders will also be paying close attention to external conditions. The contention in the United States' Congress that brought the country to the edge of a potential debt default was a reminder of the risks of nasty shocks, which could hurt China's exports.China's exports fell 0.25 percent in September in dollar terms compared with a year ago, well below most economists' expectations. But China is likely to see some improvement in export demand as the U.S. and Western European economies improve, said Tao Wang, the chief China economist at UBS Investment Bank in Hong Kong.Last week, the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, said he was confident that his government had the right economic fundamentals."China's economy is basically doing well," Mr. Xi told business leaders during a meeting in Indonesia, The People's Daily reported. "The slowdown in the pace of China's economic growth was the outcome of our own adjustment initiative."Next month, Mr. Xi will preside over a meeting of the Communist Party Central Committee that he and other senior officials have said will flesh out plans for economic changes. Chinese policy advisers and newspapers have indicated those could include some financial liberalization and adjustments in land policy to make it easier for farmers to lease out land."Right now we are still on the path of the old model," said Ms. Wang, the UBS economist. "If the government continues to push through some of the reforms – in particular, about opening up the services sector and expanding social benefits to a wider population – that should help boost consumption and employment."
HONG KONG — An important gauge of manufacturing activity in China showed a larger-than-expected uptick for October, suggesting that the economy may have picked up some steam.The early reading of a survey of purchasing managers, released Thursday morning by HSBC and compiled by the research firm Markit, reached a seven-month high at 50.9. That was up from 50.2 in September and higher than many economists had expected. Readings above 50 indicate expansion.The poll provides a closely watched indication of how the giant Chinese economy is performing each month. Although many economists caution that the renewed growth momentum may peter out in coming months and that the booming expansion rates of previous decades are a thing of the past, the rise in the purchasing managers index provided some reassurance that the pickup of recent months had extended into October.The reading "implies that China's growth recovery is becoming consolidated into 4Q following the bottoming out in 3Q," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a statement accompanying the index's release. "This momentum is likely to continue in the coming months, creating favorable conditions for speeding up structural reforms."Faced with a marked deceleration last year and early this year, the Chinese authorities have announced a string of targeted measures in recent months aimed at putting a floor under the economy.Next month, the Communist Party Central Committee is meeting. It could outline some broader, structural changes that are part of the authorities' broader goal of shifting the economy away from its dependence on exports and investments in heavy industry toward more domestic demand and more efficient, sustainable growth. Changes could include adjustments in land policy to make it easier for farmers to lease out land.
HONG KONG — An important gauge of manufacturing activity in China, released on Thursday, showed a larger-than-expected uptick for October, suggesting that the economy may have picked up steam just as the Communist Party leadership was preparing to flesh out plans for an overhaul.The early reading of a survey of purchasing managers, released by HSBC and compiled by the research firm Markit, reached a seven-month high of 50.9. That was up from 50.2 in September and higher than many economists had expected. Readings above 50 indicate expansion.The poll provides an indication of how the giant Chinese economy is performing each month, and the rise provided some reassurance that the pickup of recent months had extended into October.The reading "implies that China's growth recovery is becoming consolidated into 4Q following the bottoming out in 3Q," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a statement accompanying the index's release. He referred to the third and fourth quarters of the year. "This momentum is likely to continue in the coming months, creating favorable conditions for speeding up structural reforms."Faced with a marked deceleration of growth last year and early this year, and eager to contain some of the risks that have built up in the financial system amid a surge in lending following the global financial crisis, the Chinese authorities have announced a series of measures aimed at supporting the economy and reducing inefficient or risky lending activities.In August, for example, the authorities announced plans for a body to coordinate financial supervision, in an apparent bid to reduce risk and wean the economy from easy credit and steer it toward slower, more sustainable expansion.Steps to support the quality of future growth have included tax cuts for small businesses — which the government is eager to promote in its bid to diversify business activity — and instructions to companies in certain sectors to cut excess production capacity.The measures reflect the difficult balance that Beijing must strike as it seeks to steer a path between maintaining sufficient growth to generate jobs and social stability, yet reducing the risks that accompany headlong growth.Although a boom in lending was crucial to ensuring growth after the global financial crisis, it also helped fan a worrying buildup of local government debt and contributed to soaring property prices across much of the nation.This week, in an apparent bid to clamp down on inflation risks, the central bank drained cash from the financial system, causing money market rates to rise sharply.The Communist Party Central Committee meeting next month is expected to outline some broader, structural changes that are part of the authorities' goal of shifting the economy away from its dependence on exports and investments in heavy industry toward more domestic demand and more efficient sustainable growth.These steps could include making it easier for farmers to lease land, planning to revitalize private enterprise, and addressing a range of financial overhauls, analysts say.Economists at Bank of America Merrill Lynch wrote this week that they expected the leadership meeting to signal steps to ease the longstanding one-child policy, to start pilot projects to overhaul rural land rights, to centralize some government functions, and to promise aggressive cuts in government rules and regulations.On the financial front, they added, there could be plans to allow local governments to sell bonds — which they are currently prohibited from doing — and pledges to further open up interest rates, foreign exchange rates and capital flows to market forces.Details on many of these targets, however, will probably remain sketchy and elusive for now. And some sensitive areas, like changes for the giant state-owned enterprises, are unlikely to be addressed at all."The benign economic outlook in the near term provides favorable condition for structural reforms," Zhu Haibin, chief China economist in Hong Kong for JPMorgan, wrote about the purchasing managers' index Thursday. Regarding next month's Central Committee meeting, he said that although there was "no question" that new leaders were determined to push forward economic overhauls, "actions and implementations are more important at this stage."
HONG KONG — Nearly a year after the Japanese began to hope that their economy could turn around under new leadership, a sense of realism is replacing the euphoria.Economists and investors have grasped just how difficult it will be for Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to sustain the growth of the last few months. Nowhere is that sentiment more evident than the Japanese stock market. The Nikkei 225 index is now nearly 40 percent above where it started the year, but the gains during the last four months have been slight — just 3.4 percent.The economic recovery Mr. Abe engineered during the last year has been remarkable given the decades Japan in which languished. Buoyed by a big pickup in public works spending and a Bank of Japan policy of flooding the economy with low-interest money, growth has accelerated markedly. Deflation, the country's biggest economic problem, seems to have disappeared.The Japanese central bank said on Thursday that it now expected the economy to expand 1.5 percent in the year starting next April, up from a previous forecast of 1.3 percent.The yen, whose persistent strength weighed on Japan's important export sector for years, has fallen, making Japanese goods more competitive. That has helped corporate earnings recover, too.For many ordinary Japanese and small businesses, however, the benefits so far are less tangible. "There is no Abenomics effect at all here," Wakana Otake, the owner of a shop that sells ties in the Ginza shopping district of Tokyo, said Thursday. "We heard luxury items sell well in department stores and so on," but her shop had seen no benefit so far, she said. "It's actually worse than last year, and last year was worse than the previous year."Economists say some of the hardest work remains. Japan's leaders still have not taken on the far-reaching structural changes to make the country's businesses more competitive. The economists worry that without reform, Japan could slide back into the deflation mode that had dogged it for more than a decade.Nicknamed the "third arrow" of Mr. Abe's economic policy, these include efforts to make the labor market more flexible, improve productivity in the service sector and bring more women into the work force. Under a growth strategy laid out in June, Mr. Abe also set the goal of creating special economic zones that would relax some regulation and attract foreign investors.Many of the plans laid out in June, however, lack detail and risk being watered down, analysts said. Similarly, plans to lower corporate taxes — a move seen as crucial to bolstering Japan's competitiveness and encouraging more foreign companies to bring operations to the country — will not be completed until December."There is a sense that the series of strong announcements earlier has been replaced by mere holding statements," said Gary Dugan, chief investment officer for Asia and the Middle East for the wealth management company Coutts.The third arrow of the recovery plans seems to be "veering off target," he said. "We have scaled back our optimism on Japanese equities until there are clearer signs that measures to help the economy are being brought back on track."Izumi Devalier, Japan economist at HSBC, said, "The third arrow has not even been fired yet." She said, "Investors were hoping for really game-changing chances. But that's not how politics works in Japan. You need to build a consensus between cabinet and the bureaucracy."The likelihood now, she said, is that "there is not going to be a lot of progress on the third arrow in the next few months." Another problem is that the economic improvement of the last year has yet to directly affect many of Japan's households. Although the job market is tight and unemployment is low, companies have so far largely resisted making large investments or raising salaries.Government data released on Thursday underlined this point. Workers' total earnings edged up just 0.1 percent in September, compared with a year earlier, and summer bonus payments, an important indicator of whether companies are willing to pay more, rose just 0.3 percent.Consumer prices rose 0.7 percent in September, compared with a year earlier. That means real wages actually fell, Masamichi Adachi, an economist at JPMorgan in Tokyo, said in a research note. "While there is anecdotal information that labor shortages are pushing up the wages of certain types of workers" including construction-related workers and part-timers, he wrote, "average wages remained weak."And even though the wages of large companies are likely to increase in the next fiscal year along with profits, "it looks difficult to see a material rise in the average wages of all workers in the near future."
HONG KONG — The gradual recovery in the United States, Europe and China filtered through to much of the rest of Asia in October, data released Friday showed, lifting manufacturing activity and easing concerns about the region's flagging growth.Emerging Asia's economic expansion, red hot in the years immediately after the financial crisis, has slowed in the past few years amid persistently weak demand from the West and a sharp deceleration in China and India, two of the region's largest economies. Growth in the region slowed from 9.1 percent in 2010 to about 6 percent this year, according to estimates from the Asian Development Bank.But recent numbers show a more optimistic picture. In South Korea, for example, trade data showed October exports climbed 7.3 percent, compared with those of a year earlier, far more than expected, reflecting better demand from the rest of the world."It's looking reasonably solid," said Klaus Baader, a regional economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong, adding that South Korea is the first country in the region each month to report on its trade performance and that its export data serves as a bellwether for global demand. "It reflects the pickup we've seen in China during the third quarter — but it also reflects what is going on in the rest of the world, including the better tone in Europe, which has at least left recession now."Surveys of purchasing managers in manufacturing also showed that sector had regained some momentum.The indexes, compiled by the research firm Markit and published by HSBC, rose to their highest levels in several months in China, Taiwan, Indonesia and South Korea. In the case of Taiwan, the reading jumped a full point, to 53.0, its highest level since March 2012. And in China, a similar index published by the Chinese statistics bureau climbed to 51.4 in October, an 18-month high. The exception was India, where the index came in at 49.6, reflecting that country's slowing growth. Readings above 50 represent expansion.At the same time, the picture in Japan has improved significantly in the past few months, as a package of aggressive stimulus measures implemented by the government of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has injected vigor into an economy that had been languishing for years."Japan has ceased to be a drag on the rest of Asia," Mr. Baader said. "You have to remember, Japan is still the world's third-largest economy, so if it is back in the ballgame, it makes a significant difference to the rest of the world — and especially for Asia."The improved global backdrop has created demand in disparate areas, including air transport, with the International Air Transport Association saying on Thursday that global demand for passenger traffic had risen 5.5 percent in September from a year earlier. Asia-Pacific carriers reported an increase of 8.5 percent.Many corporate giants in the region have reported better earnings in recent days.The South Korean carmaker Hyundai Motor, for example, reported a 4 percent profit improvement for the quarter that ended in September, and Samsung Electronics' quarterly profits jumped 25 percent."It does look like the developed world environment is a bit more comfortable than it has been for the past couple of years," said Richard Jerram, chief economist at Bank of Singapore. "This is helping to provide an offset to the fact that domestically driven growth has been flagging a little bit."Mr. Jerram cautioned that the slight pickup in the October purchasing managers indexes did not necessarily herald a sustained or sharp reacceleration in the region.Growth in many of Asia's developing economies is closely tied to that of China, whose expansion has slowed from more than 10 percent before the global financial crisis to about 7.5 percent this year as the authorities have sought to put the economy on a more sustainable and balanced footing. Few analysts think the Chinese economy will manage more than 8 percent growth next year, and some believe it could sag below 7 percent.Faster growth in Japan could help increase demand from that country, but the weaker yen also means Japanese manufacturers have become more competitive, relative to their foreign rivals.And the Federal Reserve will probably pare back its support of the U.S. economy next year — a move that is likely to cause inflows of Western cash into emerging Asian economies to drop off.Rob Subbaraman, chief economist for Asia outside Japan at Nomura in Singapore, said that would be painful in Asia, which has become "addicted" to the easy money and foreign capital of the past few years.Although he expected exports from Asia to improve next year as Japan and the United States picked up steam, an ailing Europe and slower growth in China meant that exports would remain "subdued," he said."It would be rash to suddenly get bulled-up on Asia," Mr. Subbaraman said. "Investors will become increasingly more discerning, differentiating between different countries' economic fundamentals. It has become increasingly hard to generalize across the region."
TOKYO — In 2008, Toyota Motor was at giddy heights. Profit soared to a record high. The Japanese company knocked General Motors off its perch as the world's largest automaker.Then an extraordinary run of bad news — the global economic crisis, a huge recall scandal and a devastating earthquake and tsunami — led Toyota's chief executive, Akio Toyoda, to declare the company a step away from irrelevance.After five difficult years, Toyota is picking up where it left off. The automaker said Wednesday that net income for the quarter ended in September jumped 70 percent and that it expected profit to rebound to a near-record high for its full financial year, which runs through next March, thanks to favorable exchange rates and a more streamlined cost structure.Toyota raised its net profit forecast for the full year to 1.67 trillion yen, or $16.9 billion, up from a previous estimate of 1.48 trillion yen. The automaker — again the world's largest by number of vehicles sold — said it expected net sales of 25 trillion yen and operating income of 2.2 trillion yen.If Toyota meets its guidance, it will be almost back to its best year on record, which ran through March 2008, when it earned 1.72 trillion yen in net profit on sales of 26 trillion yen.For the three months through September, net income jumped 70 percent to 438.4 billion yen, Toyota said. Sales grew 16 percent to 6.28 trillion yen. Operating profit grew almost 74 percent to 251.4 billion yen.Nobuyori Kodaira, an executive vice president of Toyota, attributed the strong results to a weaker yen, which increases the value of the automaker's earnings overseas. He also credited the change in fortunes to a concerted undertaking to reduce costs, both within Toyota and at its suppliers."Of course, the weakening of the yen worked in our favor," Mr. Kodaira told reporters in Tokyo. "But the effort we and our partners put into driving down costs also led to this turnaround."Toyota shares rose 0.5 percent to 6,350 yen in Tokyo on Wednesday before the after-close earnings announcement. Shares in the automaker have climbed almost 60 percent this year, outperforming the benchmark Nikkei 225-share index, which has risen about 40 percent.The yen has weakened by 12 percent against the dollar during the same period, thanks to an aggressive monetary easing policy by the Japanese central bank, at the urging of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's government."The cyclical and intensely competitive nature of the global automotive industry may once again spoil the picture," Clive Wiggins and Kelly Zou, auto analysts at Macquarie, said in an Oct. 21 report on Toyota, "but there are also reasons to remain bullish on returns — namely, a renewed commitment to operating efficiency in the wake of the lean post-global financial crisis years."Still, Mr. Wiggins and Ms. Zou warned that a slowdown in Asia, as well as a weakening market share in the increasingly competitive United States and China, could pose risks to Toyota's return to hefty earnings. So could a loosening in cost discipline now that profits are rolling in, they said. Toyota and other exporters have come under government pressure to raise wages to spread the benefits of a weaker yen.Toyota is outshining its domestic rivals. Last week, Nissan slashed its profit forecast because of slowing demand in emerging markets and mounting recall costs. Honda said that sales were brisk in the United States and Japan but that its profits had been weighed down by heavy investment in new production lines.At the heart of Toyota's cost savings has been a strategy called the new global architecture, led by Mr. Toyoda, a scion of Toyota's founding family. The program involves sharing the same parts across a wider range of models, and adopting standardized parts used by other global automakers. The 2015 Prius gas-electric hybrid is to be the first model fully manufactured under that new initiative.With a return to big profits in sight, Toyota is also on the offensive again in next-generation green technology. The automaker, a pioneer in hybrid cars, said Monday that it would show a prototype hydrogen fuel-cell vehicle at the Tokyo Motor Show later this month. The four-seat sedan has a driving range of 500 kilometers, or about 300 miles, and can be refueled in minutes, according to Toyota. The automaker hopes to sell its first fuel-cell car in 2015.During its difficult years, Toyota raised eyebrows by going all out to winnow even its executives' pay. In the thick of the global economic crisis, Mr. Toyoda's pay came to 116 million yen. In 2013, Mr. Toyoda got a raise to 184 million yen, according to company filings. That's still about a tenth of what is received by Ford's chief executive, Alan R. Mulally, including stock options.The gap led Mr. Toyoda to joke at a talk with Japanese university students in September that Toyota's commitment to cost cutting and efficiency went beyond its cars."I've been called the world's most fuel-efficient chief executive," Mr. Toyoda said.
HONG KONG — Surprisingly strong exports reported by China on Friday bolstered the view that the global economy is improving, just as Chinese leaders were set to hold an important policy meeting to flesh out their economic agenda for the coming years.Exports rose 5.6 percent in October from a year earlier, reversing a 0.3 percent slide in September and beating expectations for a much more modest rise, according to data from the Chinese customs administration. Imports confirmed that domestic demand was solid, rising 7.6 percent from a year earlier, a little more rapidly than the 7.4 percent recorded in September.After a rocky patch earlier this year, China's economy has stabilized in recent months, echoing improvements in the United States, Japan and the long-beleaguered euro zone. Friday's data confirmed that the steady — though not stellar — expansion in the Chinese economy in recent months has continued into the start of the fourth quarter.The data "restores the export growth momentum that was evident in July and August export figures," Rajiv Biswas, Asia-Pacific chief economist at IHS Global Insight, said in a note. It "signals that China's export growth engine will continue to contribute to the moderate economic recovery underway."Combined with improved October export figures from South Korea and Taiwan in recent days and a batch of business activity measurements released last week, the numbers also supported the view that global demand has firmed as the United States and European economies picked up speed during the past few months, analysts said.The global reacceleration remains modest, however, and it remains to be seen whether the momentum can be sustained.In Japan, growth has picked up because of aggressive stimulus measures announced by the government this year. Important structural changes, however, have yet to be pushed through.Europe has emerged from recession, but concerns of a potentially drawn-out period of stagnation remain, and the European Central Bank cut interest rates on Thursday, highlighting the bank's concern.And in the United States, data released Thursday showed that the American economy expanded significantly faster than expected during the third quarter, at an annualized rate of 2.8 percent. But last month's government shutdown could undermine the pace of growth during the current quarter, analysts cautioned.A swath of economic support measures announced by Beijing over the past few months have helped put a floor under the Chinese economy. Still, the country's growth prospects are unclear as its leadership wrestles with the challenge of overhauling an economy that has depended for decades on exports, heavy industry and state-sponsored investment.China's leaders have signaled that they want to raise living standards, diversify the economy and reduce the risks that have come with a buildup in lending in recent years.They are expected to flesh out these broad goals at a policy meeting that begins Saturday.The meeting is unlikely, however, to produce a detailed rundown of planned changes, and it remains to be seen how effectively and quickly the overhauls will actually be implemented, analysts have cautioned."The outcome of the meeting is important since it will give a sense of the priorities," analysts at ABN Amro wrote in a note on Friday.But they added that no details concerning the implementation of these changes were expected and that policy makers in Beijing were likely to "opt for a cautious approach, while they consolidate their power base, by using pilot programs before spreading critical reforms nationwide."
HONG KONG — The Asian business community's initial reaction on Wednesday to the highly anticipated pronouncement of China's Communist Party leaders on how to overhaul China's economy was basically this: "long on goals and short on details," "broad-brushed," falling "some way short" of expectations.President Xi Jinping of China emerged late Tuesday after the four-day closed-door meeting of party leaders with a mandate to give markets a "decisive role" in the world's second-largest economy and for reaching "decisive outcomes" for overhauls by 2020. China also plans a new top-level working group that will push through changes.But the seemingly investor-friendly talk failed to impress. The Shanghai composite index finished 1.8 percent lower, and in Hong Kong, where many mainland companies are listed, the Hang Seng Index fell 1.9 percent.Many of the Chinese leadership's broad priorities — raising incomes for China's 1.3 billion inhabitants, for example — had already been widely telegraphed in speeches and editorials over the past year and had been welcomed by analysts who say China urgently needs to overhaul its outdated economic growth model.As a result, a summary of the leadership's deliberations was largely a reiteration, leaving analysts hungry for more details of how and when the changes would occur."There's a fair bit of disappointment," said Chris Weston, chief market strategist at IG in Melbourne, Australia. The new 2020 deadline for reaching "decisive outcomes" provided a useful time frame, he said, but "people were expecting a bit more." The market, he added, wanted "more meat to sink its teeth into."Fred Hu, founder of Primavera Capital, and a former chairman for greater China at Goldman Sachs, is optimistic about China's prospects. But he cautioned at an investor forum in Hong Kong on Wednesday, "Obviously this political commitment to a free-market economy has yet to be translated into concrete measures — the laws, regulations or policies remain to be seen."The initial communiqué from the leadership conference was never expected to lay out in specific detail the complicated puzzle of changes that are needed to put the Chinese economy on the path to more balanced and sustainable growth. This left analysts reading the runes of the communiqué's precise wordings, and continued the longstanding guessing game as to what detailed changes would be announced and, just as importantly, how thoroughly and quickly they will be carried out.The meeting, said Yao Wei, an economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong, laid out a broad road map and a rough time frame, and had the potential to mark a new beginning with positive change.The task facing China's policy makers is complex. Economists say leaders need to wean the economy off the credit and government-led investments that have fueled growth for years. In addition, they say China needs to reduce its reliance on exports and manufacturing, get its people to spend more at home, and combat the corruption and environmental degradation that have accompanied the strong growth of the past few decades.For many investors, one of the most optimistic elements of the communiqué was a change in rhetoric.Previously, the party had spoken in terms of the market taking a "basic" role. The shift to "decisive" role was significant because it "seems to suggest that a consensus has been reached about deepening market-driven reforms while avoiding embracing fundamental capitalistic changes," said Kevin Lai, an economist in the Hong Kong office of Daiwa Securities.Another potentially significant development analysts pointed to on Wednesday is the planned establishment of a new party leadership group on economic policy to oversee the introduction of market-oriented changes.The details on who will head the group have not yet been announced. But analysts said on Wednesday that the development could be positive if it succeeds in providing China with a high-level body that can circumvent the opposition that could come from players in state- owned companies and local governments who have benefited from the system and would want to preserve the status quo.It could also help speed up the process of making overhauls, which now often get bogged down in a "swamp of bureaucracy and vested interests," said Louis Kuijs, chief China economist at the Royal Bank of Scotland in Hong Kong.The communiqué released on Tuesday suggested that important changes could come in the form of overhauling tax policies, cutting red tape, and speeding up social security changes.It also hinted that farmers could be given a degree of rights over the land on which they live — a change that analysts have long said is crucial to increasing consumption and migration to cities.For more concrete evidence of how the leadership will progress, however, analysts and investors will have to wait for more detailed action plans and announcements that are likely to come in the next few weeks and months as the fuller set of decisions made at the four-day meeting is published.
BEIJING — Treasury Secretary, Jacob J. Lew, described China's declaration that market competition should have a decisive role in the country's economy as an "ambitious reform agenda," according to remarks on Friday by the secretary to the Chinese leader, Xi Jinping.After meeting with Mr. Xi and other officials here, Mr. Lew said the outcome of China's long-awaited meeting on its economic program showed there would "continue to be progress, but the question is how much and how quickly.""The direction is significant, but the character and the pace of change matters," Mr. Lew said.Mr. Lew arrived in Beijing after visiting four Asian countries that are negotiating with the United States to join the Trans-Pacific Partnership, or T.P.P., trade agreement. When completed, the trade group of 12 countries would represent 40 percent of the global economy.The Obama administration aims to have the trade talks completed by Dec. 31, a deadline that many of the participants consider optimistic. The administration is pushing for fasttrack negotiating authority that would make it easier for an agreement to move through Congress.The pact would lower tariffs, reduce the barriers to investment, improve labor rights and limit government favoritism of state-owned enterprises.The trade deal is a critical part of the administration's so-called pivot toward Asia, and for many of the countries participating in the talks, the demands are high. Japan must agree to lower barriers to agricultural trade, and in Malaysia there is growing resistance to the pact because of the need to reform state-owned enterprises.Trade ministers of the 12 countries are scheduled to meet in Singapore in December for a final round of talks."While we still have work to do, my conversations leave me with the hope that we can still complete T.P.P. this year," Mr. Lew said. "In each capital, it was clear that this is in their interest. There was a very strong focus on economic growth and T.P.P. as a part of that."China was not invited by the Obama administration to join the trade group, and Beijing initially reacted to the proposed pact as an effort by Washington to create a group it would dominate. But in recent months, some Chinese officials have expressed interest in the possibility of China joining the pact at some point.
HONG KONG — Chinese investors on Monday gave a frosty reception to the country's plans to end a yearlong ban on new stock offerings, sending some domestic markets down sharply.China's securities regulator announced on Saturday a package of overhauls to the domestic market for initial public offerings that could see new share sales resume as early as January, with a first batch of about 50 companies ready for listings.The new measures, which came after a major meeting of the Communist Party leadership last month that concluded with promises of sweeping financial overhauls, would unfreeze an I.P.O. market that has not seen a new listing since October 2012.The moratorium on share sales has created a tremendous backlog of Chinese companies seeking to tap investors for financing. As of Friday, 763 companies were waiting to list on domestic markets — with some of them on hold for several years — according to figures from the China Securities Regulatory Commission.An additional 145 companies have withdrawn their listing applications during the past year. Some of those companies that gave up opted instead for a Hong Kong listing, like the Bank of Chongqing, which raised more than $500 million in a Hong Kong I.P.O. in October.Now investors appear worried that a sudden wave of new listings will flood the Shanghai and Shenzhen markets and push down prices for I.P.O.'s and companies that are already listed.The ChiNext index, a secondary board in Shenzhen that mainly features start-up companies, fell 8.26 percent on Monday. The benchmark Shanghai Composite Index closed down 0.59 percent, and the Shenzhen composite ended 4.96 percent lower.By contrast, shares in mainland Chinese stock brokerages rose on Monday, as investors bet they would see an increase in fees from handling the anticipated wave of new I.P.O.'s.In addition to announcing the resumption of I.P.O.'s, the authorities also unveiled on Saturday several changes meant to partly shift market oversight from an approval-based regime, where the regulator vets deals individually, to a disclosure-based system where, similar to that in the United States, the burden of full compliance is on the companies.The measures include changes that would better protect minority shareholders and give the market a bigger role in the pricing of I.P.O.'s. They would also permit companies to buy back shares and issue preferred shares."The latest reforms appear serious about tackling the chronic, longstanding problem of high I.P.O. valuations," Steven Sun, the head of China equity strategy at HSBC, wrote Monday in a research report.Mr. Sun noted that China has suspended new share offerings eight times in the 20 years since the country's modern stock markets were set up, and that markets fell on five of seven occasions after the authorities announced I.P.O.'s were to resume.He said the benchmark index in Shanghai, which is made up of large state and private companies, was unlikely to see much impact. Smaller companies that trade on the ChiNext would feel the biggest drag, he added.The ChiNext index has more than doubled since November 2012 as speculators have driven up valuations, but it is expected to come under pressure in the coming months as many smaller and younger companies seek to list there."ChiNext, given its hefty valuation and the bull run this year, might see a much bigger correction due to the anticipated supply shock," Mr. Sun wrote.
HONG KONG — China moved on Thursday to restrict its banks from using Bitcoin as currency, citing concerns about money laundering and a threat to financial stability.The action comes as monetary authorities around the world have begun to confront the issue of Bitcoin, a virtual currency whose value has soared in recent months as interest in it has spread. Part of its rise has been driven by intense demand for the virtual currency in China.The notice curtailing financial institutions' involvement with Bitcoin was issued by the People's Bank of China and four other ministries and agencies, and the directive said the step was needed to "protect the status of the renminbi as the statutory currency, prevent risks of money laundering and protect financial stability."The notice said that Bitcoin was "not a currency in the real meaning of the word" but was rather a "virtual commodity that does not share the same legal status of a currency. Nor can, or should, it be circulated or used in the marketplace as a currency."Last month, in a sign of Bitcoin's growing acceptance, American regulatory officials told a Senate hearing that financial networks like Bitcoin offered tangible benefits for the financial system. But they warned of the potential for money laundering and other criminal activity associated with such networks.The remarks by United States officials, along with wider acceptance of the virtual currency by merchants, had helped propel the value of the virtual currency beyond $1,100, leaving its total worldwide value at more than $11 billion. It dropped more than $100 on Thursday, according to the Mt.Gox exchange, which handles Bitcoin trading online, to $1,100 from $1,217.Bitcoin was established in 2009 by an anonymous programmer or collective known as Satoshi Nakamoto. Part of the value of the currency is attributable to its limited supply. A maximum of 21 million units can be created, leading investors to bid up the price as demand grows.But with the growing acceptance of the virtual currency has come increasing concerns about its potential use in illicit transactions. In October, the American authorities arrested Ross Ulbricht, the alleged founder of the online marketplace Silk Road, after claiming that the site was being used to buy and sell drugs, weapons and pornography. Bitcoin was the primary form of payment on Silk Road, where people could make purchases anonymously.The Chinese move came after officials in Beijing had expressed some support for the legitimacy of Bitcoin. Yi Gang, the deputy governor of the People's Bank of China and the director of the State Administration of Foreign Exchange, said in November that although the virtual currency might not find favor with China's central bank, people should be free to participate in the Bitcoin market.That sentiment was echoed in the announcement Thursday."Ordinary members of the public have the freedom to participate in Bitcoin transactions as a kind of commodity trading activity on the Internet, provided they assume the risks themselves," the statement said.In China, Bitcoin was starting to gain favor even among merchants. In the Chaoyang district in Beijing, a restaurant started accepting Bitcoins for payment in defiance of earlier regulation stating that virtual currencies could not be used to purchase real-life goods or services.But in its statement Thursday, the Chinese central bank raised questions about whether Bitcoin could ever gain true legitimacy as legal tender: "In essence, Bitcoin is a kind of special virtual commodity, and does not have the same legal status as a currency.""Currently, the public lacks sufficient understanding of Bitcoin, and some individuals have been caught up by faddishness or a speculative mentality in holding, using and trading in Bitcoins," the statement said.The explanation said that Bitcoins possess "quite high speculative risks," because of the relatively small market and 24-hour trading, with no curbs on market declines. It said: "The price can be easily controlled by speculators, creating severe turbulence and huge risks. Ordinary investors who blindly follow the crowd can easily suffer major losses."
HONG KONG — The Chinese economy is no longer as red-hot as it once was, but it remains solidly growing, judging by data released over the past few days.Figures released by the national statistics bureau on Tuesday showed that industrial output, an important gauge of economic activity, grew 10 percent in November, compared with a year earlier. That was a touch below analysts' forecasts, but in line with the performance of the past few months.Retail sales climbed 13.7 percent, solidly beating analyst expectations and picking up from the previous few months, the government said.And investment in fixed assets such as equipment and machinery — an important factor in China's growth in recent years — climbed 19.9 percent in the first 11 months of 2013, compared with the same period a year ago. That was slightly less than expected.Those numbers followed solid trade data reported on Sunday, which showed November exports gaining 12.7 percent — nearly twice what analysts polled by Thomson Reuters had forecast. And a survey of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector produced a reading of 51.4 for November, unchanged from the previous month but solidly above the 50-point mark that separates expansion from contraction.Taken together, analysts said, the data painted a picture of an economy that is ticking along with perhaps a little less gusto than in the past few months, but much more robustly than at the start of this year. That was when slowing growth prompted Beijing to deliver a series of measures aimed at propping up activity. Those moves, and somewhat firmer demand for Chinese-made goods from overseas, have helped put the economy on track for an expansion of about 7.5 percent this year, economists said.The November data, China analysts at the Spanish bank BBVA said in a research note on Tuesday, "point to a moderating, though still strong, growth momentum."The performance also provides a generally solid backdrop to an important meeting of Communist Party leaders that began in Beijing on Tuesday.At that meeting — the annual Central Economic Work Conference, as it is formally known — China's top leaders are expected to map out the country's economic policy agenda for the coming year, effectively putting more flesh on the bones of the broad-brush policy pronouncements made at a larger party gathering last month. That meeting laid out the longer-term goals for revamping the Chinese economy in a bid to put its once supercharged growth on a more sustainable and balanced footing.The economic work conference this week is expected, among other things, to set a target for the pace of economic expansion next year.Analysts reading the runes of statements and recommendations made by government research organizations in recent weeks said it remained unclear whether the official 2014 growth target would be kept at 7.5 percent or trimmed closer to 7 percent.Although there were some signs last month that policy makers could lean toward trimming back the official target, the momentum more recently seems to have shifted toward 7.5 percent, according to Zhang Zhiwei, chief China economist in the Hong Kong office of Nomura, citing a forecast of 7.8 percent this week by the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. That number, in Mr. Zhang's view, implied an official target of 7.5 percent for the coming year.
BEIJING — Growth in activity in China's vast factory sector slowed to a three-month low in December as reduced output offset a pickup in new orders, a preliminary private survey showed on Monday, in line with other recent data pointing to a resilient but slowing economy.The flash Markit/HSBC Purchasing Managers' Index fell to 50.5 from November's final reading of 50.8, but for a fifth consecutive month remained above the 50 line that separates expansion of activity from contraction.Given the approaching year-end holiday season, the flash P.M.I. covers only the short period from Dec. 5 to Dec. 12. The final P.M.I. will be released Jan. 2.Growth in both new orders and export orders grew at a faster rate in the period surveyed, while subindexes measuring employment and stocks of purchases showed faster rates of decrease.The December HSBC Flash China Manufacturing P.M.I. reading "slowed marginally" from November's final reading, said Hongbin Qu, chief economist for China at HSBC, in a comment accompanying the P.M.I. "But it still stands above the average reading for the third quarter, implying that the recovering trend of the manufacturing sector starting from July still holds up."Many economists have said China's economy is likely to show weaker momentum in the final three months of this year after a rebound between July and September, because of slowing credit growth and a fall in restocking demand.Data earlier in the month showed growth in China's factory output and investment eased slightly in November, though retail sales grew at their strongest rate this year, suggesting the economy is on track to achieve the government's 7.5 percent growth target.Beijing has made it clear that it would accept a slower growth rate while it pushes ahead with economic overhauls to wean the growth away from investment and export toward consumption.The leadership pledged to maintain stable economic policies to achieve reasonable economic growth in 2014 while pursuing overhauls, as they wrapped up a meeting Friday. The meeting, the annual Central Economic Work Conference, did not set a target for 2014 G.D.P. growth, with state media reporting that the government would "maintain appropriate growth in gross domestic product."
HONG KONG — China's biggest Bitcoin exchange was forced to stop accepting deposits in the Chinese currency on Wednesday, sending the price of the virtual money tumbling in one of its biggest markets globally.The exchange, BTC China, made the announcement in a post on its verified account on Weibo, China's Twitter-like messaging service.The development comes less than two weeks after China's central bank and four other government agencies that regulate finance and technology issued a joint announcement banning Chinese financial institutions from dealing in the virtual currency."For reasons we all know, BTC China has had to cease renminbi-account charging functions," the exchange said in its message, referring to accounts in the Chinese currency. It said that it would continue operating and that deposits denominated in Bitcoins as well as renminbi withdrawals would be unaffected.By Wednesday evening, the Shanghai-based BTC was quoting Bitcoins at about 2,300 renminbi, or about $380, apiece. That was nearly 40 percent lower than where they had traded on Tuesday and less than half of their peak price of 7,395 renminbi on Dec. 1.According to Chinese news reports, the People's Bank of China, the central bank, met Monday with more than 10 of the country's biggest third-party payment processing companies, ordering them to stop all transactions involving digital currencies. Alibaba's Alipay service, the country's biggest processor of online transactions, was among the companies represented at the meeting, according to the reports.On Dec. 5, the central bank and the four agencies jointly banned dealing in Bitcoin, saying the government was acting to "safeguard the interests and property rights of the public, protect the legal standing of the renminbi, take precautions against the risk of money laundering and maintain financial stability."At the time, a spokesman for the central bank took issue with describing Bitcoin as a currency: "It is not issued by a central monetary authority, it does not have the properties of legal currency and it is not a currency in the real meaning of the word."This is not the first time China has cracked down on digital currencies. In 2009, the government banned an online currency developed by Tencent, one of the country's biggest Internet companies.
SHANGHAI — China's local government debt has reached an "alarming level" and poses a significant risk to the country's fast-growing economy, according to a Chinese government think tank.Two years after analysts began raising concerns about municipal borrowing, Chinese local governments appear to have piled up even more debt, about $3.3 trillion by the end of 2012, perhaps double the level in 2010.The report, released this week by the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, is the latest indication that China may be investing too aggressively in property and infrastructure projects, potentially setting the stage for a wave of loan defaults and a severe economic downturn.While many economists expect China's economy to grow 7 percent in 2014, there are mounting concerns about the sustainability of the country's economic engine.In Beijing, the authorities are pushing to restructure the economy to make it more market oriented, in the hopes of tackling inefficiencies and potentially huge hidden liabilities.In recent years, China's growth has been fueled by heavy investment in infrastructure, everything from new highways and railways to ports, subways and shopping malls.Growth weakened at the outset of the global financial crisis. But in 2009, Beijing backed a huge economic stimulus program that accelerated growth and pushed up property prices.Now, analysts say the investment binge may have been excessive."What bothers me is not the current level of debt but the pace of the increase," says Shen Minggao, a Hong Kong based economist at Citigroup Global Markets. "But if the pace of growth is slowed or capped, that will have a direct impact on infrastructure growth."Infrastructure spending, Mr Shen says, has been one of the crucial pillars of China's growth engine over the last decade. If investment slows, it could be difficult and painful.Earlier this year, the authorities in Beijing indicated that managing the risks of local government debt would be a high priority in the coming years. Some officials proposed Holding local authorities more accountable for excessive debt build up; other bureaucrats hinted the central government may be forced to step in and help bail out some localities.One of the unknowns is how much debt exists. There have been a wide range of figures tallied, though all of them suggest trillions of dollars of debt just on the part of local governments.Analysts say much of the debt is masked by "shadow banking" activities. Such activities allow large amounts of lending to take place off the books, through trust companies and so-called local government financing vehicles.
